PRIVACY POLICY
Your privacy is very important to us. Making great apps for iPhone, iPad, Apple Watch and Mac is our business. Selling your data is not. We limit the data we collect to the minimum necessary to provide you with our services and to improve our products.
This Privacy Policy covers how we collect, use, disclose, transfer, and store your information. Please take a moment to get to know our practices and contact us if you have any questions.
For purposes of this Privacy Policy, the terms „Meaningful Things“, „we“, „us“, and „our“ refer to Meaningful Things GmbH & Co. KG; the terms „app“ and „apps“ refer to the software and related services we offer through Apple’s App Store and Mac App Store; and „you“ refers to you, as user of the apps and our services.
For the purposes of this Privacy Policy, “Personal Information“ or „Personal Data“ means data that allows someone to identify or contact you, including, for example, your name and email address, as well as any other non-public information about you that is associated with or linked to any of the foregoing data.
Information We May Collect and How We Use It
Diagnostic Data
We might ask you to send us anonymized diagnostics data from within the app to help us troubleshoot possible issues and identify bugs. This data does not contain any personal information and will only be used to analyze possible issues. - Legal basis Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR
Account Creation
When you create an optional user account, we collect information such as your name and email address. When you Sign In with Apple (SiWA), we save your name to our encrypted database for reference. You may hide your email and name during the SiWA process.
This information is used in order to connect your payment information within the app to an account so that you can use the app across different platforms. We can also use this information to help you restore your upgrade if you delete and reinstall the app. We might also use this information when you file bug reports with us, this means that we’re able to correspond with you to help you to solve any issues or investigate and fix issues where necessary.
When you register with your email address, we use your email address to occasionally send you news, offers and updates about our products. If you no longer wish to receive emails, or other communications from us, you may opt-out by either contacting us directly at
hello[at]meaningful-things.com
or by clicking the unsubscribe button of any email you receive. Legal basis Art. 6(1)(a+f) GDPR
Direct Communication (Support & Feedback)
We use Groove’s software service to manage and store all incoming email messages and reply to your questions. If you contact us via
support[at]meaningful-things.com
,
hello[at]meaningful-things.com
,
hello[at]masterbuilders.io
,
support[at]masterbuilders.io
or
support[at]focusapp.io
, we obtain your e-mail address and may obtain your name, as well as the information you voluntarily provide within your e-mail message when communicating with us. Data processing is based on your consent according to article 6(1) GDPR. You can object at any time.
Upon request, we can provide you with information about whether we hold any Personal Information. Upon request, we delete all of your personal data related to this service. To request this information, please email
hello[at]
meaningful-things.com
Legal basis Art. 6(1) GDPR
We use Tally to collect direct feedback about our apps. Participation in customer surveys is voluntary, and all responses are anonymous. We do not collect any personal information.
Information Collection Through our Website
When accessing our website, Squarespace uses functional and required cookies to allow visitors to navigate on our website. Learn more about functional and required cookies at:
https://support.squarespace.com/hc/en-us/articles/360001264507#toc-functional-and-required-cookies
.
We do not use analytics and performance cookies on our website and disabled the collection of analytics information with Squarespace, so we do not collect or see visitors’ IP addresses or other personal data.
Third-Party Services We Use
We use the following services which might be involved in processing your personal data:
TestFlight
For beta testing our apps, we are using TestFlight, a beta testing service provided by Apple Inc (Place of processing: US). If you choose to take part in beta testing, Apple will collect and send crash logs, your personal information such as first name, last name and email address, usage information, and any feedback you submit to the developer. Apple retains TestFlight data for one year.
You can opt out from testing by using the link at the bottom of the invitation email to notify us that you’d like to be removed from our list or by contacting us at hello@meaningful-things.com. If you accepted the invitation and no longer wish to test the app, you can delete yourself as a tester in the app’s Information page in TestFlight by tapping Stop Testing. For more information, please visit:
https://testflight.apple.com
.
Apple’s Privacy Policy can be found at
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/
iCloud
iCloud is an online database storage service provided by Apple, Inc (Place of processing: Europe or US). This service makes it possible to store and sync your app data across all devices. iCloud is both private and secure. You can learn more about iCloud here: https://www.apple.com/icloud/  We have no access to your app data stored in iCloud, but you can download or delete your data at any time in the app settings under "Privacy". Apple’s Privacy Policy can be found at
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/
.
RevenueCat
Our app uses RevenueCat to facilitate subscriptions (Place of processing: US). RevenueCat is a service used to verify App Store receipts, process subscription purchases, restore previous purchases and sync purchase status between devices signed into your Apple ID. RevenueCat provides us with data on when a user first used the app and with information about purchased subscriptions. This information is linked to an anonymous App User ID. RevenueCat does not have access to any Personal Information. RevenueCats privacy policy can be found here:
https://www.revenuecat.com/privacy
.
TelemetryDeck
We use TelemetryDeck to collect anonymized usage data (Place of processing: EU). This helps us understand how our users are using our app and how we can improve it. TelemetryDeck does not collect any personally identifiable information. You can read more about TelemetryDeck’s privacy policy at
https://telemetrydeck.com/privacy
.
Supabase
We use Supabase as a database for our platform. We use the database to store your profile information required for login (email), and optional profile information (name and marketing preferences). With Sign in with Apple, you can choose to hide your email to keep your personal information privat. We do not use Supabase to collect any further information about you. You have the option to delete your account using the app, upon which all your data stored with Supabase will be erased. Supabase's privacy policy can be found here:
https://supabase.com/privacy
.
Squarespace
Our Site is hosted by Squarespace (Place of processing: US). Personal Information hosted by or through Squarespace is subject to their privacy policy which may or may not contain terms as protective as this Privacy Policy. By using our Site, you are agreeing to be bound by Squarespace’s privacy policy, which can be found at
https://www.squarespace.com/privacy
.
MailChimp
MailChimp is an email address management and message sending service provided by The Rocket Science Group, LLC (Place of processing: US).  This type of service makes it possible to manage a database of email contacts, phone contacts or any other contact information to communicate with the User. They also collect data concerning the date and time when the message was viewed by the User, they browsers and operating system, as well as when the User interacted with the email message, such as by clicking on links included in the message (this works via a so called web-beacon).  MailChimp’s Privacy Policy can be found at
https://mailchimp.com/legal/privacy/
.
Tally
Tally is a service which we use to create forms, such as feedback surveys, provided by Tally BV (Place of processing: EU). Form data (questions and responses) is stored with Tally, and will be deleted after 180 days. Participation in customer surveys is voluntary, and all responses are anonymous. We do not collect any personal information. Tally is based in the EU and all form and user data is stored in Belgium, EU. Tallys Privacy Policy can be found at
https://tally.so/help/privacy-policy
.
Groove
Groove is a customer support software service provided by Groove Networks, LLC (Place of processing: US). We use this software service to manage and store all incoming e-mail messages. Groove uses email read receipt tracking to notify us when a user has read our reply.
Grooves’s Privacy Policy can be found at
https://www.groovehq.com/our/privacy
.
Consent to Share Consumption Data with Apple:
By using our app and making in-app purchases, you consent to our sharing of data regarding your usage and consumption of purchased content with Apple, as part of our efforts to resolve refund requests. This information may include details about how you have accessed and interacted with the purchased content. The purpose of sharing this data is to help Apple make an informed decision regarding refund requests. We ensure that such data sharing is done in compliance with Apple's policies and only as necessary to process your requests.
How Long We Store Your Data For
We store your data for as long as German law requires, or as is necessary for the fulfillment or the initiation of a contract, or as long as we claim legitimate interests. After this period, all personal data will be deleted.
Access To and Deletion of Personal Information (Under GDPR)
Upon request, Meaningful Things will provide you with information about whether we hold, or process on behalf of a third party, any of your personal information and how to access this data.
You can also request, that we correct any inaccurate information about you.
Upon request, we will delete any of your Personal Information.
To request information about, access, rectification or deletion of your Personal Information, please email hello[at]meaningful-things.com.
You can access and delete you app specific data stored with iCloud directly within the settings of our apps as described unter the section "iCloud".
Disclosure to 3rd parties
We don’t share personal information with anyone outside of Meaningful Things, except for the few exceptions below.
We share personal information if disclosure of such information is reasonably necessary to satisfy any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request; to enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations thereof; to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud or security issues; and to protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Meaningful Things, its users or the public as required or permitted by law.
If Meaningful Things is involved in a reorganization, merger, or sale, the information we collect may be transferred as part of that transaction.
Our Policy Toward Children
We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 13. If we learn that we have collected personal information from a child under 13, we will promptly delete this information. Parents or guardians can contact us at hello[at]meaningful-things.com.
Links to 3rd Party Sites and Services
Our website or any of our services may contain links to third-party websites or services. We are not responsible for the information collected by those third parties and we encourage you to read their privacy policy before submitting any personal information to them.
About this Privacy Policy
Our Privacy Policy may change from time to time. When we change the policy, we will post the changes on this page, and, if the policy changes in a significant way, we will also provide a prominent notice (e.g. on our website).
If you have any questions regarding our Privacy Policy, please contact us at hello[at]meaningful-things.com.
Last modified: December 20, 2024
Contact information
Meaningful Things GmbH & Co. KG
Gartenstr. 49
72074 Tübingen
Germany
hello[at]meaningful-things.com
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Legal
Open Menu
Close Menu
Hardware
Software
Sales & Support
Internet Services
Intellectual Property
More Resources
JavaScript is required to view this content.
Something went wrong.
The content for this page did not load correctly. Reload the page to try again.
Reload Page
Choose a Topic
Privacy Policy
Apple ID and Family Sharing Disclosure
Privacy Governance
Government Information Requests
Manage Your Account
Sub-policy 1
https://www.revenuecat.com/privacy:
Privacy Policy
This is the Privacy Policy for the website hosted at https://www.revenuecat.com/ (
“our site”
), our products and services, and for other RevenueCat activities at which you may provide your personal data, such as sponsored events or trade shows. The site is operated by or on behalf of RevenueCat, Inc. (
“we”
,
”us”
,
“our”
). We are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy.
This policy (together with our terms of service and any other documents referred to in it) sets out:
Information we collect
Cookies and other tracking technologies
How we use your information
Our promotional updates and communications
Lawful Bases
Who we share your information with
Where we store your information
How we respond to DNT signals
How we protect your information
How long we keep your information
EU Citizen Rights
Note to Users Outside the United States
Changes to this policy
Contact us
Please read the following carefully to understand our views and practices regarding your personal data and how we will treat it. By engaging in our site and services, you acknowledge you have read and understood this privacy policy. To the extent  applicable privacy law includes the European Economic Area General Data Protection Regulation, (the “GDPR”) with respect to personal data collected by us, the data controller for purposes of GDPR is: RevenueCat, Inc., 1032 E BRANDON BLVD #3003 BRANDON, FL 33511
UNITED STATES
Our site may, from time to time, contain links to external sites. We are not responsible for the privacy policies or the content of such sites.
Information we collect
We will collect and process the following personal data from you:
Information you give us, which may consist of:
Information about you that you give us by filling in forms on our site or by corresponding with us by phone, e-mail or otherwise. It includes information you provide when you register to use our site, subscribe to our service, search for a product, in discussion boards or other social media functions on or via our site, enter a competition, promotion or survey, submit a query, providing information at trade shows or sponsored events and when you report a problem with our site;
Your name, address, e-mail address and phone number, financial and credit card information, personal description and photograph, login and password details; and
Employment details if you send us a CV, resumé or other details of your employment history in connection with an advertised job vacancy or a general inquiry regarding employment opportunities with us.
Technical information, which may include the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer to the Internet, your login information, browser type and version, time zone setting, operating system and platform;
Information about your visit, which may include the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL), clickstream to, through and from our site (including date and time), page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs), methods used to browse away from the page, and any phone number used to call our customer service number or social media handle used to connect with our customer service team.
IP Location data, where IP addresses are collected and location is inferred based on IP location.
Information collected from other platform activities.
If you are using our products or services as a developer, the following information regarding your end users may be received and processed by us:
“End User Technical Information”: This refers to technical information related to an end user’s mobile device or computer, such as: device type, operating system,
“End User Transaction Information”: This refers to transaction information related to an end user’s activities with respect to your app or other digital product, and may include:
Last seen time that the end user used your app or digital product;
Apple receipt file; and
Google purchase token,
“Optional End User Information”: This refers to information that we may receive if you select or enable this option in our products, which may include:
User ID of the end user in your app or digital product; and
Additional attribution or metadata associated with an end user.
End User Technical Information, End User Transaction Information, and Optional End User Information are collectively referred to as “End User Information”.
Information we receive from other sources
We may receive other personal data about you:
If you use any of the other websites or apps we operate or the other services we or our affiliates provide.
From third parties we work with:, which may include Zapier Lead Scoring.
Cookies and other tracking technologies
Our site uses cookies and/or other similar technologies such as device-IDs, in-app codes, pixel tags or web beacons to collect and store certain information. These typically involve pieces of information or code that a website transfers to or accesses from your computer hard drive or mobile device to store and sometimes track information about you. Cookies and similar technologies enable you to be remembered when using that computer or device to interact with websites and online services and can be used to manage a range of features and content as well as storing searches and presenting personalized content. Our site uses cookies and similar technologies to distinguish you from other users of our site. This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you browse our site and use our service and also allows us to improve our site. Most web browsers automatically accept cookies and similar technologies, but if you prefer, you can change your browser to prevent that and your help screen or manual will tell you how to do this. However, you may not be able to take full advantage of our website if you do so. A number of cookies and similar technologies we use last only for the duration of your web or app session and expire when you close your browser. Others are used to remember you when you return to the site and will last for longer. We use these cookies and other technologies on the basis that they are necessary for the performance of a contract with you, or because using them is in our legitimate interests (where we have considered that these are not overridden by your rights), and, in some cases, where required by law, where you have consented to their use.
How we use your information
Information we collect:
We will use this information in our legitimate interests, where we have considered these are not overridden by your rights:
To administer our site and for internal operations, including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, statistical and survey purposes.
To keep our site safe and secure.
For measuring or understanding the effectiveness of advertising we serve to you and others, and to deliver relevant advertising to you.
To improve our site to ensure that content is presented in the most effective manner for you and for your computer.
To allow you to participate in interactive features of our site and service, when you choose to do so.
To deliver and improve our products and services and your overall user experience.
Information we receive from other sources:
We may combine this information with information you give to us and information we collect about you in our legitimate interests (where we have considered that these are not overridden by your rights). We will use this information and the combined information for the purposes set out above (depending on the types of information we receive).
‍
End User Information:
We will only use End User Information to provide our services and products to you, in accordance with the agreement agreed to and signed by us.
Our promotional updates and communications
Where permitted in our legitimate interest or with your prior consent where required by law, we will use your personal information for marketing analysis and to provide you with promotional update communications by email about our products and services. You can object to further marketing at any time by checking and updating your contact details within your account, or selecting the “unsubscribe” link at the end of all our marketing and promotional update communications to you, or by submitting your email address here.
Lawful Bases
We will only collect and process personal data where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent(where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g. to operate the site or deliver any products or services you have requested) and “legitimate interests”. We rely on our legitimate interests as our lawful basis only where those interests are not overridden by the impact on you (unless we have your consent or our processing is otherwise required or permitted by law). If you have questions about the lawful bases of how we process your personal information, contact us at
compliance@revenuecat.com
.
Who we share your information with
We may share your information with:
Any member of our group, which means our subsidiaries, our ultimate holding company and its subsidiaries, who support our processing of personal data under this policy. If any of these parties are using your information for direct marketing purposes, we will only transfer the information to them for that purpose with your prior consent.
Selected third parties which may include:
Organizations who process your personal data on our behalf and in accordance with our instructions and applicable law. This includes organizations supporting the services we offer through the site, in particular organizations providing website and data hosting services, providing fulfillment services, distributing any communications we send, supporting or updating marketing lists, and facilitating feedback on our services. These organizations (which may include third party suppliers, agents, sub-contractors and/or other companies in the RevenueCat group of companies) will only use your information to the extent necessary to perform their support functions.
Analytics and search engine providers that assist us in the improvement and optimization of our site and subject to the cookie section of this policy (this will not identify you as an individual).
Payment processing providers, such as Stripe, who provide secure payment processing services. (Your payment card details are not shared with us by the provider.)
We will disclose your personal information to third parties:
In the event that we sell or buy any business or assets, in which case we will disclose your personal data to the prospective seller or buyer of such business or assets, subject to the terms of this Privacy Policy.
If RevenueCat or substantially all of its assets are acquired by a third party, in which case personal data held by it about its customers will be one of the transferred assets.
If we are under a duty to disclose or share your personal data in order to comply with any legal obligation, or in order to enforce or apply our terms of service, terms of use, and other agreements with you; or to protect the rights, property, or safety of RevenueCat, our customers, or others.
Where we store your information
The data that we collect from you will be stored securely on Amazon Web Services (“AWS”) in the USA.
How We Respond to DNT Signals
Your browser settings may allow you to automatically transmit a Do Not Track signal to websites and other online services you visit. We do not alter our practices when we receive a Do Not Track signal from a visitor’s browser because we do not track our visitors to provide targeted advertising. To find out more about Do Not Track, please visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com
.
Public forums
The site may, from time to time, make chat rooms, message boards, news groups and/or other public forums available to its users. Any information that is disclosed in these areas becomes public information and you should exercise caution when using these and avoid posting any personal information.
Child safety
The site is intended for use only by persons who are at least 16 years of age. By using the site, you confirm to us that you meet this requirement. If you are under the age of 16, you confirm you have received permission from your parent or guardian before using this site or sending us personal information.
Payment processing
Payment details you provide will be encrypted using secure sockets layer (SSL) technology before they are submitted to us over the internet. Payments made on the site are made through our payment gateway provider. You will be providing credit or debit card information directly to the operator which operates a secure server to process payment details, encrypting your credit/debit card information and authorizing payment. Information which you supply is not within our control and is subject to the operator’s own privacy policy and terms and conditions.
How we protect your information
Security is one of our biggest priorities at RevenueCat. Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the security of your data transmitted to our site; any transmission is at your own risk. Once we have received your information, we will use strict procedures and security features to try to prevent unauthorized access.
All application data is secured in transit using TLS.
Any payment transactions will be encrypted using SSL.
RevenueCat audits changes to the application throughout the development lifecycle: architecture reviews are performed as well as stringent automated and manual code review processes.
RevenueCat monitors application servers, infrastructure, and the RevenueCat network environment to detect potential abuse.
RevenueCat uses Amazon Web Services (“AWS”) to persistently store Customer data and does not host Customer data on its premises. AWS is a leading cloud provider, and holds industry best security certifications, such as SOC2 and ISO 27001. Customer data sent to RevenueCat from around the world is sent to AWS data centers located in the United States.
How long we keep your information
We retain personal data during any period in which you have expressed an interest in our products and services, for as long as you have an account with us in order to meet our contractual obligations to you, and for six years after that to identify any issues and resolve any legal proceedings. We may also retain aggregate information beyond this time for research purposes and to help us develop and improve our services. You cannot be identified from aggregate information retained or used for these purposes.
EU Citizen Rights Under GDPR
You have the right under certain circumstances:
to be provided with a copy of your personal data held by us.
to request the rectification or erasure of your personal data held by us.
to request that we restrict the processing of your personal data (while we verify or investigate your concerns with this information, for example).
to object to the further processing of your personal data, including the right to object to marketing.
to request that your provided personal data be moved to a third party.
You may opt out at any time from allowing further access by us to your location data by emailing compliance@revenuecat.com.
Your right to withdraw consent:
Where the processing of your personal information by us is based on consent, you have the right to withdraw that consent without detriment at any time by going here.
You can also exercise the rights listed above at any time by contacting us at
compliance@revenuecat.com
. We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law.
We would appreciate the opportunity to directly address any GDPR issues you may have. Please contact us at compliance@revenuecat.com. You do, however, have the right to approach your local data protection authority, (see http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/bodies/authorities/index_en.html for data protection authorities in the EU).
Data processed on behalf of our Customers
RevenueCat may process End User Information on behalf of its customers. We are not the controllers of this data and act as data processors, and have no direct relationship with the individuals or end users whose personal information it processes. The processing of personal data sent from our Customers is governed by our
Terms of Use
,
Data Processing Addendum
or any other agreement agreed to and signed by us with our Customers. These agreements cover data transfers to third parties that may occur as part of RevenueCat’s provision of its services to the customer. We will process such data on behalf of the customer as prescribed in the respective agreements between RevenueCat and the customer. The customer’s privacy policy or other agreement between the customer and you (or your organization) will apply to such processing, and not this policy.
If your personal data is processed by RevenueCat on behalf of one of our customers and you wish to discontinue such processing, or if you seek to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate data, please contact the RevenueCat customer (the data controller) directly. The RevenueCat customer should then provide instructions to us, if necessary. If requested to remove data by the data controller we will respond within a reasonable timeframe. We will retain personal information pursuant to our retention policy and will retain this personal information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
Note to users outside the United States
RevenueCat is based in the United States. The Site and our products and services are controlled and operated by us from the United States and are not intended to subject us to the laws or jurisdiction of any state, country or territory other than that of the United States. Your personal data may be stored and processed in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, and by using the Services you consent to the transfer of information to countries outside of your country of residence, including the United States, which may have data protection rules that are different from those of your country. In certain circumstances, courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies or security authorities in those other countries may be entitled to access your personal data.
Changes to this policy
Any changes we make to our privacy policy in future will be posted on this page and, in relation to substantive changes, will be notified to you by email.
Contact Us
Questions, comments and requests regarding this privacy policy are welcomed and should be addressed to:
Compliance Officer
RevenueCat, Inc.
1032 E BRANDON BLVD #3003 BRANDON, FL 33511 UNITED STATES
compliance@revenuecat.com
‍
Sub-policy 2
https://telemetrydeck.com/privacy:
This document has last been updated March 4, 2024
TelemetryDeck was designed from the ground up with privacy in mind. An important principle of TelemetryDeck is to only save the least amount of data it absolutely needs, and to not save any data that can be used to identify specific users' identities.
That is why the
TelemetryDeck Client code
is completely open source, so that users and developers can see for themselves the data that TelemetryDeck saves.
TelemetryDeck has never installed any law enforcement software or equipment anywhere on our network.
Data Transmitted
Any data that is transmitted to the analytics server consists of the following:
An anonymized user identifier. The identifier is constant for each app install but cannot be traced back to any personally identifiable information.
An action taken, such as “App Launched” or “Settings Opened”. The developer defines these actions.
A time stamp when the action was taken.
Device metadata, namely platform, system version, app version, build number, if the build was downloaded via App Store or TestFlight, and the device model type (i.e., iPhone X, iPad Air, or iPhone 12).
Additional metadata as defined by the developer, such as “Number of Items in the Database” or “Setting X is enabled”. Developers should note this metadata in their own privacy policy.
For Web SDK API requests, we look at the first 3 triplets of incoming IP addresses in order to determine a possible country the request came from.
IP addresses are never stored on the TelemetryDeck Server, neither in the database nor in any log files, nor at any other place.
Terms Used
A
developer
is a person who creates or maintains an app which includes the TelemetryDeck Client code. They are responsible for making sure they only hand anonymized data to the TelemetryDeck Client.
The
TelemetryDeck Client
is the code that transmits data to the TelemetryDeck Server. It can be viewed on
GitHub
in its entirety.
A
user
is a person who uses any app created by a
developer
. It is our job to make sure their data stays safe.
A
signal
is one instance of data sent from the app to the TelemetryDeck Server using the TelemetryDeck Client.
TelemetryDeck Viewer
is the app that developers use to see signal data, both raw and in aggregated form, as
Insights
.
User Identifiers
Developers have three choices on how to identify users. They should note which they are using in their app's privacy policy:
Using no user identifier at all. This will give them the greatest piece of mind, while still allowing TelemetryDeck to help them out with statistical analysis.
Using Apple's “IdentifierForVendor” API. This is the default behaviour for TelemetryDeck. The identifier generated out with this method has no relation to any of the user's identifiable information or private data. Deleting and reinstalling the app will generate a new identifier and sever any connection to the old one.
Using a custom string identifier, such as the user's username or email address. This string will never be transferred directly to the server. Instead, the TelemetryDeck Client will create a hash out of that string and only ever transmit that hash. This allows TelemetryDeck to detect the same user on multiple devices, but it is impossible for both the developer and any person having access to TelemetryDeck's database to retrieve the original custom string identifier.
Metadata
Developers can include any metadata they wish with signals they send using TelemetryDeck Client. They are urged to not send any data that might identify their users. They must include the types of data they send in their own apps' privacy policies.
Using TelemetryDeck Viewer
Developers using the TelemetryDeck Viewer app are sending signals to the TelemetryDeck Server as well. These do not contain any user data. The types of data are:
App was launched
Which part of the app was navigated to?
Standard metadata: platform, system version, app version, build number, if the build was downloaded via App Store or TestFlight, and the device model type (i.e. iPhone X, iPad Air, or iPhone 12).
Our Customers and Prospects
We use the integrated software solution Hubspot for managing the address and contact data (contact management) of our customers and prospects. The service provider is HubSpot Inc., a software company from the USA (Hubspot, Inc. 25 First Street Cambridge, MA 02141 USA).
We use Hubspot to document appointments and agreements, as well as to evaluate our activities in the sales area. Personal data such as name, email address, phone numbers, business addresses, and the content of business communication may be processed.
The legal basis for processing in the context of contacting for the conclusion or performance of a contract is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b GDPR or Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR. Our legitimate interest lies in the use for the purpose of the CRM system as contact management.
Data will be deleted as soon as they are no longer required for their intended purpose and there are no legal retention obligations, e.g. for data that must be kept for commercial or tax reasons. In accordance with legal requirements in Germany, storage may be necessary for up to 10 years due to commercial and tax regulations. We delete prospect data within a reasonable period of time, within which no more contract conclusion or the like is to be expected.
The data of TelemetryDeck GmbH is stored in European data centers by Hubspot. However, personal data may be transferred to the USA and other third countries where HubSpot subsidiaries are located. HubSpot meets the minimum requirements for legally compliant order data processing by concluding the EU standard data protection clauses. We have concluded a contract for order processing (Data Processing Agreement, DPA) with HubSpot.
Further information on data processing by Hubspot can be found at:
https://legal.hubspot.com/privacy-policy
.
Newsletter
You have the option to subscribe to the newsletter offered on our website. If you would like to receive the newsletter, we require an e-mail address from you as well as information that allows us to verify that you are the owner of the specified e-mail address and agree to receive the newsletter. For this purpose, we use the so-called double opt-in procedure: After your registration, you will receive an e-mail to the specified e-mail address, in which we ask for confirmation of the registration.
The following information is then saved with the confirmation:
E-mail address
Date of subscription
Activity (delivered, opened, clicked)
For customers who subscribe to our newsletter when opening an account, the following information is also stored:
First name
Last name
Country
Organization
Further data is not collected or only on a voluntary basis. We use this data exclusively for sending the requested information and for proving your registration.
Your consent is the exclusive basis for processing the data provided in the newsletter registration form (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR). You can revoke your consent to the storage of the data, the e-mail address and their use for sending the newsletter at any time by unsubscribing from the newsletter, for example via the “unsubscribe” link in the newsletter. The legality of the data processing operations carried out up to that point remains unaffected by the revocation.
Please note that unsubscribing from our newsletter list does not result in the deletion of your data. If you wish to delete your personal data from Mailjet, please inform us informally by e-mail.
Mailjet
Newsletters and customer information are sent via the service provider Mailjet. The provider is Sinch AB Lindhagensgatan 74 Stockholm, 112 18 Sweden. The data is stored in secure data centers located exclusively in the European Union, with Google Cloud Platform in Frankfurt (Germany) and St. Ghislain (Belgium).
Mailjet is a service that, among other things, organizes and analyzes the sending of newsletters and customer information. Mailjet processes the following information on our behalf regarding the status of the subscription (subscribed, unsubscribed) as well as the status of the newsletters (delivered, opened, clicked and the exact button or link).
For more information about Mailjet, please visit
Mailjet's privacy policy
.
Sub-policy 3
https://supabase.com/privacy:
Product
Developers
Enterprise
Pricing
Docs
Blog
79.5K
Sign in
Start your project
Open main menu
Privacy Policy
#
Last Modified: 9 Oct 2024
Previous Version:
4 Aug 2024
Thank you for your interest in Supabase, Inc., ("
Supabase
," "
we
", "
our
" or "
us
"). Supabase provides a suite of open source tools, stitched together to build a seamless developer experience. This Privacy Notice explains how information about you, that directly identifies you, or that makes you identifiable ("
personal information
") is collected, used and disclosed by Supabase in connection with our website at
supabase.com
(the "
Site
") and our services offered in connection with the Site (collectively with the Site, the "
Service
").
What Does This Privacy Notice Apply To?
#
This Privacy Notice explains how we use your personal information when you use the Service, either as an individual customer or when you access the Service through one of our enterprise customers' accounts. We are the data controller of your personal information when we use it as described in this Privacy Notice, meaning that we determine and are responsible for how your personal information is processed.
Our Service allows customers to submit, manage or otherwise use content relating to others, such as end users of applications built and managed through the Service or their employees and contractors (“
Customer Data
”). We use such Customer Data primarily as a processor, meaning we process such Customer Data on behalf of and under the instructions of the relevant customer, in accordance with our
data processing addendum
. This Privacy Notice does not apply to such processing; if you believe your personal information has been included in any Customer Data, we recommend you read the Privacy Notice of the respective customer.
This Privacy Notice sets out how we use personal information. It does not cover our use of information that is not "personal information", "personal information" or similar terms under applicable law. This means that it does not cover our use of aggregated or anonymized information.
Where applicable law permits, it also does not cover deidentified information, meaning information that is maintained in a form that is not reasonably capable of being associated with or linked to an individual (please note that this would not apply to personal information collected from you if you are in the UK, EEA or Switzerland).
We may also provide you with additional privacy notices or disclosures where the scope of the inquiry, request, or personal information we require falls outside the scope of this Privacy Notice. In that case, the additional Privacy Notice or disclosures will set out how we may process the information you provide at that time. Please note that this Privacy Notice does not cover or apply to our processing of information about our employees or contractors or applicants for positions at Supabase.
Region-specific Disclosures
#
California - Your California Privacy Rights:
If you are a California resident, California Civil Code Section 1798.83 permits you to request information regarding the disclosure of personal information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes during the immediately preceding calendar year. Note we do not share your personal information with third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Nevada:
Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes permits a Nevada resident to opt out of future sales of certain covered information that a website operator has collected or will collect about the resident. Note we do not sell your personal information within the meaning of Chapter 603A. However, if you would still like to submit such a request, please contact us at
support@supabase.com
.
European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland:
If you are located in the European Economic Area ("
EEA
"), United Kingdom or Switzerland, or otherwise engage with Supabase’s European operations, please see the
Privacy Disclosures for the European Economic Area, United Kingdom and Switzerland
for additional European-specific privacy disclosures, including the lawful bases we rely on to process your personal information, how we use cookies when you access our Sites from the EEA, UK or Switzerland and your rights in respect of your personal information.
Note for International Visitors:
Personal information may be transferred to, stored and processed in a country other than the one in which it was collected. For example, the Sites are primarily hosted in and provided from the United States. Please note the country to which personal data is transferred may not provide the same level of protection for personal information as the country from which it was transferred.
Click on the links below to jump to each section:
Information we collect and our use
How we share personal information
Control over your information
How we use cookies and other tracking technology to collect information
Data retention and security
Links to third-party websites and services
Children's privacy
Changes to this privacy notice
Contact us
Privacy disclosures for the European Economic Area, United Kingdom and Switzerland
1. Information we collect and our use
#
We collect personal information in connection with your visits to and use of the Service. This collection includes information that you provide in connection with the Service, information from third parties, and information that is collected automatically such as through the use of cookies and other technologies.
Information That You Provide
#
We collect personal information that you submit directly to us. The categories of information we collect can include:
Registration information.
We collect personal and/or business information that you provide when you register for an account on the Site. This information may include your name, email address, GitHub username. We use this information to administer your account, provide you with the relevant services and information, communicate with you regarding your account, the Site and for customer support purposes.
Payment information.
If you make a purchase or payment on the Site, such as for a subscription, we collect transactional information provided in connection with your purchase or payment. Please note that we use third party payment processors, including Stripe, to process payments made to us. As such, we do not retain any personally identifiable financial information such as credit card numbers. Rather, all such information is provided directly by you to our third-party processor. The payment processor’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy notice. To view Stripe’s privacy notice, please visit:
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
Communications.
If you communicate with us through any paper or electronic form, we may collect your name, email address, mailing address, phone number, or any other personal information you choose to provide to us. We use this information to investigate and respond to your inquiries, and to communicate with you, to enhance the services we offer to our users and to manage and grow our organization. If you register for our newsletters or updates, we may communicate with you by email. To unsubscribe from promotional messages, please follow the instructions within our messages and review the
Control Over Your Information section
below. If you become a contributor, we may also collect your GitHub name and feature you on our website.
Inquiries and Feedback.
If you contact us, we will collect the information that you provide us, such as your contact information and the contents of your communication with us.
You are free to choose which personal information you want to provide to us or whether you want to provide us with personal information at all. However, some information, such as your name, address, payment transaction information, and information on your requested Services may be necessary for the performance of our contractual obligations.
After registration, you may create, upload or transmit files, documents, videos, images, data or information as part of your use of the Service (collectively, “
User Content
”). User Content and any information contained in the User Content, including personal information you may have included, is stored and collected as part of the Service. You have full control of the information included in the User Content.
Information from Third Party Sources
#
We may receive personal information about you from our business partners and service providers and combine this information with other data we collect from you. The third-parties may include website and service operators and payment processors and marketing partners. The information may include contact information, demographic information, information about your communications and related activities, and information about your orders. We may use this information to administer and facilitate our services, your orders and our marketing activities.
Single Sign-On.
We use single sign-on ("
SSO
") such as Github to allow a user to authenticate their account using one set of login information. We will have access to certain information from those third parties in accordance with the authorization procedures determined by those third parties, including, for example, your name, username, email address, language preference, and profile picture. We use this information to operate, maintain, and provide to you the features and functionality of the Service. We may also send you service-related emails or messages (e.g., account verification, purchase confirmation, customer support, changes or updates to features of the Site, technical and security notices).
Social Media.
When you interact with our Site through various social media, such as when you click on the social media icon on the Site, follow us on a social media site, or post a comment to one of our pages, we may receive information from the social network such as your profile information, profile picture, user name, user ID associated with your social media account, and any other information you permit the social network to share with third parties. The data we receive is dependent upon your privacy settings with the social network. We use this information to operate, maintain, and provide to you the features and functionality of the Service, as well as to communicate directly with you, such as to send you email messages about products and services that may be of interest to you.
Information from Other Sources.
We may obtain information from other sources, including through third-party information providers, our shareholders, customers, or through transactions such as mergers and acquisitions. We may combine this information with other information we collect from or about you. In these cases, our Privacy Notice governs the handling of the combined personal information. We use this information to operate, maintain, and provide to you the features and functionality of the Service, as well as to communicate directly with you, such as to send you email messages about products and services that may be of interest to you.
Other Uses of Personal Information
#
In addition to the uses described above, we may collect and use personal information for the following purposes:
For our business activities, including to operate the Service and to provide you with the features and functionality of the Service;
To communicate with you and respond to your requests, such as to respond to your questions, contact you about changes to the Service, and communicate about account related matters;
For marketing and advertising purposes, such as to market to you or offer you with information and updates on our products or services we think that you may be interested in. While we may use your personal information in this manner, please note that we do not use User Content to send you ads, and we will never share User Content with any third parties for marketing or advertising purposes, unless you have explicitly submitted it to us for that purpose;
For analytics and research purposes;
To enforce our
Terms of Service
, to resolve disputes, to carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and to protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties;
To comply with contractual and legal obligations and requirements;
To fulfill any other purpose for which you provide personal information; and
For any other lawful purpose, or other purpose that you consent to.
2. How we share personal information
#
We may share your personal information in the instances described below. For further information on your choices regarding your information, see
Control Over Your Information
.
We may share your personal information with third-party service providers or business partners who help us deliver or improve our Site or services, or who perform services on our behalf. These third parties
are subject to reasonable confidentiality terms and provisions restricting their use of your personal information
, and may include parties that process payments and coordinate billing, provide web hosting services, or provide analytics.
Third parties as required by law or subpoena or if we reasonably believe that such action is necessary to (a) comply with the law and the reasonable requests of law enforcement; (b) to enforce our
Terms of Service
or other agreements or to protect the security or integrity of the Supabase services, including to prevent harm or financial loss, or in connection with preventing fraud or illegal activity; and/or (c) to exercise or protect the rights, property, or personal safety of Supabase, our Customers, visitors, or others.
We may share with other companies and brands owned or controlled by Supabase, and other companies owned by or under common ownership as Supabase. These companies will use your personal information in the same way as we can under this Privacy Notice.
We may transfer any information we collect in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including any shares in the company) or any portion or combination of our products, services, businesses and/or assets. Should such a transaction occur (whether a divestiture, merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, liquidation, or similar transaction or proceeding), we will use reasonable efforts to ensure that any transferred information is treated in a manner consistent with this Privacy Notice.
We may disclose your information publicly or with another third party with your prior authorization.
With others in an aggregated or otherwise anonymized form that does not reasonably identify you directly or indirectly as an individual.
3. Control over your information
#
Email Communications
#
From time to time, we may send you emails regarding updates to our Service, products or services, notices about our organization, or information about products/services we offer (or promotional offers from third parties) that we think may be of interest to you. If you wish to unsubscribe from such emails, simply click the “unsubscribe link” provided at the bottom of the email communication. Note that you cannot unsubscribe from certain services-related email communications (e.g., account verification, confirmations of transactions, technical or legal notices).
Modifying Account Information
#
If you have an online account with us, you have the ability to modify certain information in your account (e.g., your contact information) through the account options provided on the Site. If there is personal information in your User Content, you can use the features and functionality of the Service to edit or delete the personal information or User Content. Not all personal information is maintained in a format that you can access or change. If you would like to request access to, or correction or deletion of personal information, you may send your request to us at the email provided below. We will review your request and may require you to provide additional information to identify yourself, but we do not promise that we will be able to satisfy your request.
4. How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technology to Collect Information
#
We, and our third-party partners, automatically collect certain types of usage information when you visit our Site. We typically collect this information through a variety of tracking technologies, including cookies, web beacons, embedded scripts, location-identifying technologies, file information, and similar technology (collectively, “
tracking technologies
”).
We, and our third-party partners, use tracking technologies to automatically collect usage and device information, such as:
Information about your device and its software, such as your IP address, browser type, Internet service provider, device type/model/manufacturer, operating system, date and time stamp, and a unique ID that allows us to uniquely identify your browser or your account (including, for example, a persistent device identifier), and other such information.
When you access our sites from a mobile device, we may collect unique identification numbers associated with your device or our mobile application mobile carrier, device type, model and manufacturer, mobile device operating system brand and model, and depending on your mobile device settings, we may be able to approximate a device’s location by analyzing other information, like an IP address.
Information about the way you access and use our services, for example, the site from which you came and the site to which you are going when you leave our services, the pages you visit, the links you click, whether you open emails or click the links contained in emails, whether you access the services from multiple devices, and other actions you take on the Site.
We use the data collected through tracking technologies to: (a) remember information so that you will not have to re-enter it during your visit or the next time you visit the site; (b) provide custom content and information; (c) identify you across multiple devices; (d) provide and monitor the effectiveness of our services; (e) monitor aggregate metrics such as total number of visitors, traffic, usage, and demographic patterns on our Site; (f) diagnose or fix technology problems; and (g) to provide, plan for, and enhance our services.
Note we do not engage in online targeted advertising.
Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies Opt-Out.
Depending on your browser or mobile device, you may be able to set your browser to delete or notify you of cookies and other tracking technology by actively managing the settings on your browser or mobile device.
If you would prefer not to accept cookies, most browsers will allow you to: (i) change your browser settings to notify you when you receive a cookie, which lets you choose whether or not to accept it; (ii) disable existing cookies; or (iii) set your browser to automatically reject cookies. Please note that doing so may negatively impact your experience using the sites, as some features and services on our sites may not work properly. Depending on your mobile device and operating system, you may not be able to delete or block all cookies. You may also set your e-mail options to prevent the automatic downloading of images that may contain technologies that would allow us to know whether you have accessed our e-mail and performed certain functions with it.
5. Data Retention and Security
#
We will retain your personal information for the length of time needed to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Notice, unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law. We store data on servers in the U.S. or any other country in which Supabase or its affiliates, subsidiaries, agents or contractors maintain facilities. If you are located in a country where laws governing data collection and use differ from U.S. law, please note that your personal information may be transferred to a country and jurisdiction that does not have the same data protection laws as your jurisdiction. When you register for use with Supabase you have the option of where you store your information and we will not transfer it without providing information to you in advance.
Supabase cares about the security of your information and uses commercially reasonable physical, technical and organizational measures designed to preserve the integrity and security of all information we collect. However, no security system is impenetrable, and we cannot guarantee the security of our systems 100%. In the event that any information under our control is compromised as a result of a breach of security, we will take reasonable steps to investigate the situation and where appropriate, notify those individuals whose information may have been compromised and take other steps, in accordance with any applicable laws and regulations.
6. Links to Third-Party Websites and Services
#
For your convenience, our Site may provide links to third-party websites or services that we do not own or operate. We are not responsible for the practices employed by any websites or services linked to or from the services, including the information or content contained within them. Your browsing and interaction on any other website or service are subject to the applicable third party’s rules and policies, not ours. If you are using a third-party website or service, you do so at your own risk. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any site or service before providing any personal information.
7. Children’s Privacy
#
Our services are not intended for children under the age of 13. We do not knowingly solicit or collect personal information from children under the age of 13. If we learn that any personal information has been collected inadvertently from a child under 13, we will delete the information as soon as possible. If you believe that we might have collected information from a child under 13, please contact us at
privacy@supabase.com
.
8. Changes to Privacy Notice
#
We reserve the right to change this Privacy Notice from time to time in our sole discretion. We will notify you about material changes in the way we treat personal information by sending a notice to the primary email address specified in your Supabase account and/or by placing a prominent notice on our Site. It is your responsibility to review this Privacy Notice periodically. When we do change the Privacy Notice, we will also revise the “last modified” date.
9. Contact Us
#
For additional inquiries about this Privacy Notice, please send us an email at
privacy@supabase.com
.
Privacy disclosures for the European economic area, United Kingdom, and Switzerland.
#
The following disclosures (“
Privacy Disclosures
”) apply to you if you access or use the Site or the Services from the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland.
Supabase, Inc is the data controller of your personal information when we use it as described in these Privacy Disclosures, meaning that we determine and are responsible for how your personal information is processed.
1. Personal Information You Provide To Us
#
We collect the following categories of personal information that you submit directly to us when you use the Service:
(a)
Contact information
, such as first name, last name and email address
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
When you create an account and access the Service as an individual, we use this information to set up and authenticate your account on the Service.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you and to take steps prior to entering into a contract with you, namely our Terms of Service.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Stripe, Orb, Hubspot, Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, Postmark,Twilio, Fly.io, and PandaDoc.
We use this information to communicate with you, including sending service-related communications.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you, namely our Terms of Service.
We use this information to deal with enquiries and complaints made by or about you relating to the Service.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely administering the Service, and for communicating with you effectively to respond to your queries or complaints.
We use this information to send you marketing communications in accordance with your preferences.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you have given us consent to do so.
(b)
Your registration / account information
. When you create an account and access the Service as an individual, If you use an email and password to sign up to the service we will collect your email address, and password. If you use Github we use single sign-on ("
SSO
") such as Github to allow a user to authenticate their account using one set of login information. The data we receive is dependent on your privacy settings with the social network.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
We use this information to create your account on the Service.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Github, Amazon Web Services.
(c)
Payment transaction and billing information
. When you make a purchase through your own individual account on the Service, we collect information such as your billing address and Tax ID and other information such as date and time of your transaction and products / services purchased.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
We use this information to process your orders through the Service and collect payment.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Stripe, Orb, Tableau, PandaDoc, Hubspot, and Amazon Web Services.
We use this information to verify your identity in connection with the detection and prevention of fraud or financial crime.
The processing is necessary for our and third partiers' legitimate interests, namely the detection and prevention of fraud and financial crime.
(d)
Chat, comments and opinions
. When you contact us directly, e.g. by email or phone or through our feedback form we will record your comments and opinions.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
When you contact us about your own individual account, or contact us as a prospective customer, we use this information to address your questions, issues and concerns.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely communicating with you and responding to queries, complaints and concerns.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Hubspot, Tableau, Google Gsuite, Notion, Amazon Web Services, and Slack.
We use this information to improve the Service.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests (to develop and improve our service).
(e)
Information you submit through our Supabase AI tool
. When you submit a query through our Supabase AI tool, we will collect the content of your query and information about the databases and other content you manage through the Service. We will only collect information about the structure of your databases and metadata, such as column and row headings or other information about how that content is organized. We will not access the content of the databases itself or the information you manage through the Service.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
When you use the Supabase AI to submit queries through your own individual account, we will use this information to generate automated responses to your query.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you, namely our Terms of Service.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: OpenAI, LLC and its affiliates, Fly.io, and AWS.
We this information to assess the performance of the chatbot tool and improve the Service.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests (to develop and improve our service).
(f)
Information received from third parties, such as social networks
. If you interact with us through a social network, we may receive information from the social network such as your name, profile information, and any other information you permit the social network to share with third parties. We use single sign-on ("
SSO
") such as Github to allow a user to authenticate their account using one set of login information. The data we receive is dependent on your privacy settings with the social network.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
We use this information to reshare content created through the use of the Service.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests (to develop our service and inform our marketing strategy).
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Commonroom, Github, and Slack.
We use this information to authenticate you and allow you to access the Service.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you.
2. Information we collect about your Use of the Site and Service.
#
We also automatically collect the following personal information about how you access and use the Service, and information about the device you use to access the Service:
(a)
Approximate Location information
. When you visit our Service, we may collect information about your location. This information may be derived from WiFi positioning or your IP address.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
We use information to present the Service to you on your device, including localizing features of the Service.
The processing is necessary for performance of a contract with you, namely our Terms of Service. If you access the Service as an authorized user of another customer, the processing is necessary for our and the customer's legitimate interests, namely presenting the Service to you on your device.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Sentry, Tableau, Posthog, Plausible, BigQuery (Google Cloud), Fly.io, Vercel, Cloudflare, Configcat, and Amazon Web Services.
We use this information to determine content that may be of interest to you.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you give us your consent to do so.
(b)
Information about how you access and use the Service
. For example, how frequently you access the Service, the time you access the Service and how long you use it for, the approximate location that you access the Service from, the site from which you came and the site to which you are going when you leave our website, the website pages you visit, the links you click, whether you access the Service from multiple devices, and other actions you take on the Service.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
We use information about how you use and connect to the Service to present the Service to you on your device.
The processing is necessary for performance of a contract with you, namely our Terms of Service. If you access the Service as an authorized user of another customer, the processing is necessary for our and the customer's legitimate interests, namely presenting the Service to you on your device.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Posthog, Plausible, Fly.io, Sentry, Hubspot, BigQuery (Google Cloud), Vercel, and Amazon Web Services.
We use this information to monitor and improve the Service and business, resolve issues and to inform the development of new products and services.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you give us your consent to do so.
(c)
Log files and information about your device
. We also collect information about the tablet, smartphone or other electronic device you use to connect to the Service. This information can include details about the operating systems, browsers and applications connected to the Service through the device and your IP address.
How we may use the Personal Information
Legal Bases for Processing
Recipients of Personal Information
We use information about how you use and connect to the Service to present the Service to you on your device.
The processing is necessary for performance of a contract with you, namely our Terms of Service. If you access the Service as an authorized user of another customer, the processing is necessary for our and the customer's legitimate interests, namely presenting the Service to you on your device.
We may share this information with the following service providers through the provision of the Service: Posthog, Plausible, Hubspot, Fly.io, Vercel, Sentry, Google Cloud, and Amazon Web Services.
We use this information to identify and detect multiple attempts to access the Service to detect fraudulent use of the Service, attempts to breach the security of the Service and to ensure that the Service does not get overloaded.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely maintaining the security and integrity of the Service.
We use this information to monitor and improve the Service and business, resolve issues and to inform the development of new products and services.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you give us your consent to do so.
We may link or combine the personal information we collect about you and the information we collect automatically.
We may anonymize and aggregate any of the personal information we collect (so that it does not directly identify you). We may use anonymized information for purposes that include testing our IT systems, research, data analysis, improving the Service. We may also share such anonymized and aggregated information with others.
3. How long will we store your personal information
#
We will usually store the personal information we collect about you for no longer than necessary for the purposes set out above, in accordance with our legal obligations and legitimate business interests.
The criteria used to determine the period for which personal information about you will be retained varies depending on the legal basis under which we process the personal information:
(a)
Legitimate Interests
. Where we are processing personal information based on our legitimate interests, we generally will retain such information for a reasonable period of time based on the particular interest, taking into account the fundamental interests and the rights and freedoms of data subjects.
(b)
Consent
. Where we are processing personal information based on your consent, we generally will retain the information until you withdraw your consent, or otherwise for the period of time necessary to fulfill the underlying agreement with you or provide you with the applicable service for which we process that personal information.
(c)
Contract
. Where we are processing personal information based on contract, we generally will retain the information for the duration of the contract plus some additional limited period of time that is necessary to comply with law or that represents the statute of limitations for legal claims that could arise from the contractual relationship.
(d)
Legal Obligation
. Where we are processing personal information based on a legal obligation, we generally will retain the information for the period of time necessary to fulfill the legal obligation.
(e)
Legal Claim
. We may need to apply a “legal hold” that retains information beyond our typical retention period where we face threat of legal claim. In that case, we will retain the information until the hold is removed, which typically means the claim or threat of claim has been resolved.
(f)
Contact information
– if you have an account with us, we retain this for as long as you have an account on our services, and for 60 days after you close your account.
In all cases, in addition to the purposes and legal bases, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal information, as well as the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal information.
4. Recipients of Personal Information
#
In addition to the recipients listed above, we may also share your personal information with the following:
Recipients
Why we share your personal information with these recipients
How these recipients will use your personal information
Service providers
We will share your personal information with third party vendors and other service providers that perform services for us or on our behalf, which may include mailing, email or chat services, payment and billing services, fraud prevention, web hosting, or providing analytic services.
These recipients will use your personal information as processors on our instructions.
Advisors
We may share your personal information with companies that provide professional and advisory services to us, such as legal and accounting services.
These recipients will use your personal information to provide professional services to us. The lawful basis we rely on for sharing personal information with these recipients is that the sharing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely receiving professional advice.
Affiliates
We will share personal information with other companies owned by or under common ownership as Supabase, including our subsidiaries (i.e., any organization we own or control) and our ultimate holding company (i.e., any organization that owns or controls us) and any subsidiaries it owns.
These companies will use your personal information in the same way as we can under these Privacy Disclosures. The lawful basis we rely on for sharing your personal information is that it is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely providing global support and management of the Service.
Purchasers and third parties in connection with a business transaction.
Your personal information may be disclosed to third parties in connection with a transaction, such as a merger, sale of assets or shares, reorganization, financing, change of control or acquisition of all or a portion of our business. For instance, if we sell the Service to a third party, we will share the personal information we have collected through the Service with that buyer.
These recipients will use your personal information to complete a transaction to buy all or the part of our business that includes the Service. The lawful basis for sharing personal information with these recipients is that it is necessary for our and the recipient's legitimate interests, namely completing a transaction to buy all or part of our business.
Law enforcement, regulators and other parties for legal reasons.
we may share your personal information with third parties as required by law or if we reasonably believe that such action is necessary to (i) comply with the law and the reasonable requests of law enforcement; (ii) detect and investigate illegal activities and breaches of agreements, including our Terms; and/or (iii) exercise or protect the rights, property, or personal safety of Supabase, its users or others.
These recipients will use your personal information in the performance of their regulatory or law enforcement role. The lawful basis we rely on for sharing personal information with these recipients is that the processing is either necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely enforcing our rights or complying with requests from regulatory authorities.
5. Marketing and Advertising
#
From time to time we may contact you with information about our services, including sending you marketing messages and asking for your feedback on our services. Most marketing messages we send will be by email. For some marketing messages, we may use personal information we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant marketing information to share with you.
We will only send you marketing messages if you have given us your consent to do so. You can withdraw your consent at a later date by clicking on the unsubscribe link at the bottom of our marketing emails or by updating your preferences via your account on the Service.
6. Storing and Transferring your Personal Information
#
Security
. We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal information we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers. We will never requesting credit or debit card information or national identification numbers from you through unsolicited emails or phone calls.
International Transfers of your Personal Information
. The personal information we collect may be transferred to and stored in countries outside of the jurisdiction you are in where we and our third party service providers have operations, including the United States and Singapore.
These international transfers of your personal information will be made pursuant to appropriate safeguards in accordance with applicable law:
Where we may transfer your personal information
Safeguards that apply to that transfer
United States
The transfer is subject to standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission or the UK Information Commissioner for the transfer of personal information.
Singapore
The transfer is subject to standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission or the UK Information Commissioner for the transfer of personal information.
If you wish to enquire further about these safeguards used, please contact us using the details set out at the end of these Privacy Disclosures.
7. Your rights in respect of your personal information
#
In accordance with applicable privacy law, you have the following rights in respect of your personal information that we hold:
Right of access
. You have the right to obtain:
confirmation of whether, and where, we are processing your personal information;
information about the categories of personal information we are processing, the purposes for which we process your personal information and information as to how we determine applicable retention periods;
information about the categories of recipients with whom we may share your personal information; and
a copy of the personal information we hold about you.
Right of portability
. You have the right, in certain circumstances, to receive a copy of the personal information you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format that supports re-use, or to request the transfer of your personal information to another person.
Right to rectification
. You have the right to obtain rectification of any inaccurate or incomplete personal information we hold about you without undue delay.
Right to erasure
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to erase your personal information without undue delay if the continued processing of that personal information is not justified.
Right to restriction
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to limit the purposes for which we process your personal information if the continued processing of the personal information in this way is not justified, such as where the accuracy of the personal information is contested by you.
Right to withdraw consent
. There are certain circumstances where we require your consent to process your personal information. In these instances, and if you have provided consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent. If you withdraw your consent, this will not affect the lawfulness of our use of your personal information before your withdrawal.
You also have the right to object to any processing based on our legitimate interests where there are grounds relating to your particular situation. There may be compelling reasons for continuing to process your personal information, and we will assess and inform you if that is the case. You can object to marketing activities for any reason.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to your local data protection authority. If you are based in the European Union, information about how to contact your local data protection authority is available
here
. If you are based in the UK or Switzerland, your local data protection authorities are the UK Information Commissioner's Office (
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home/the-fdpic/contact/address.html
).
If you wish to exercise one of these rights, please contact us using the contact details at the end of these Privacy Disclosures.
Due to the confidential nature of data processing we may ask you to verify your identity when exercising the above rights.
8. Cookies and similar technologies used on our European Services
#
Cookies
We use the following types of cookies:
Cookie
Type of cookie
When is the cookie dropped?
How long does the cookie stay on my device?
Purpose of the cookie
Links to respective privacy notices
Stripe
Strictly necessary
When you access the payment interface on our Service.
30 minutes
Detecting and preventing fraudulent payments and transactions.
Stripe Cookie Settings
Stripe
Strictly necessary
When you access the payment interface on our Service.
1 year
Detecting and preventing fraudulent payments and transactions.
Stripe Cookie Settings
Stripe
Strictly necessary
When you access the payment interface on our Service.
2 years
Detecting and preventing fraudulent payments and transactions.
Stripe Cookie Settings
Cloudflare
Strictly necessary
When you first access the Site.
30 minutes
Identify and block bots from accessing the Service.
Cloudflare Cookies
Cloudflare
Strictly necessary
When you first access the Site.
End of Session
Manage traffic to our Service to ensure that it does not get overloaded.
Cloudflare Cookies
Youtube
Strictly necessary
When you view a Youtube embedded video on our Site.
End of Session
To display embedded videos to you on our Site.
Google Cookie Policy
hCaptcha
Strictly necessary
When you respond to a CAPTCHA to prove you are not a robot.
End of Session
To record your responses to the CAPTCHA and grant you access to certain areas of the Service.
hCaptcha Privacy Policy
Posthog
Analytics
When you access the Service.
1 year
To monitor and analyze how you use the Service.
Posthog Privacy Policy
Cookies are pieces of code that we transfer to your computer's hard disk for record-keeping purposes. The cookies listed as strictly necessary are required for the operation of the Service, such as cookies that enable you to log in to secure areas of the Service.
We use Analytics cookies to collect information to assess how our Service is used. We will only do so, however, only if you give us your consent to do so.
Manage preferences
Most browsers also allow you to change your cookie settings to block certain cookies. Depending on your mobile device and operating system, you may not be able to delete or block all cookies. Please note that if you choose to refuse all cookies you may not be able to use the full functionality of our Service. These settings will typically be found in the "options" or "preferences" menu of your browser. In order to understand these settings, the following links may be helpful, otherwise you should use the "Help" option in your browser for more details.
Cookie settings in Internet Explorer
Cookie settings in Firefox
Cookie settings in Chrome
Cookies settings in Safari web
and
iOS
.
If you would like to find out more about cookies and other similar technologies, please visit
allaboutcookies.org
.
Please note that deleting or blocking cookies may not be effective for all types of tracking technologies, such as Local Storage Objects (LSOs) like HTML5.
Sub-policy 5
https://mailchimp.com/legal/privacy/:
Privacy & Security
Your Privacy
Your Privacy
Protect Your Privacy
Do Not Call Policy
Privacy Statements
Privacy Statements
For Consumers
For Consumers
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
For Applicants & Employees
For Applicants & Employees
English
Français
Español
For Contingent Workers
For Contingent Workers
English
Français
Español
Intuit Financial Services
Intuit Financial Services
English
Security Center
Security Center
Our Security Practices
Account Security Checklist
Online Safety Tips
Security Notices
Responsible Disclosure
Responsible AI
FAQ
hide
Contact Us
Privacy & Security
Your Privacy
Protect Your Privacy
Do Not Call Policy
Privacy Statements
For Consumers
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
For Applicants & Employees
English
Français
Español
For Contingent Workers
English
Français
Español
Intuit Financial Services
English
Security Center
Our Security Practices
Account Security Checklist
Online Safety Tips
Security Notices
Responsible Disclosure
Responsible AI
FAQ
hide
Contact Us
GLOBAL PRIVACY STATEMENTS
You deserve transparency into our data use
Select your preferred language
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
Intuit Global Privacy Statement
Last Updated: September 8, 2024
See previous Privacy Statements
Expand All
Collapse All
Scope of this Privacy Statement and our role
Intuit responsibly leverages technology to power prosperity around the world. We believe that everyone has a right to privacy. As a financial services and technology company, we’re providing this Global Privacy Statement (
“Privacy Statement”
) to explain how we, Intuit Inc. and the
Intuit group companies
(collectively
“Intuit,” “we,” “us,” or “our”
), collect, use, share, or otherwise process information that we collect through our services. These services include, as applicable, our websites, mobile applications, social media pages, marketing activities, and other activities described in this Privacy Statement, or when other businesses provide us your personal information (collectively, the
“Services”
). This Privacy Statement is global, meaning it applies to all Intuit Services. We may provide additional or supplemental privacy statements for certain products or services.
This Privacy Statement describes our privacy practices when we process:
Personal information for the purposes of preparing a tax return or in connection with the preparation of a tax return (collectively, “
Tax Preparation Information
”) as part of providing TurboTax tax preparation services;
Personal information for the purposes of providing the benefits of our websites and the Intuit platform, which includes all of Intuit’s services, sites, experiences and software (including through our mobile applications and desktop applications) other than Tax Preparation Information (the “
Intuit Platform
”); and
Personal information as necessary to manage, run, improve, and develop our business and personalize your experience while interacting with the Intuit Platform. Depending on your settings, this may include showing you personalized ads or recommending certain Intuit products based on your interests.
Intuit determines the purposes and means of the processing of your personal information as described in this Privacy Statement, and therefore acts as a ‘data controller’ (or equivalent/similar terms under applicable data privacy laws) of such information. We may share your personal information within the
Intuit group companies
and conduct processing activities as controllers or joint controllers for the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement.
In certain circumstances, there may be more than one data controller processing your personal information. For example, your employer or a financial partner may also act as a data controller. In these situations, we act as an independent data controller over our processing activities. This means we determine how your personal information will be processed independently from the other data controllers. The other data controllers have their own obligations under applicable data privacy laws. Intuit is not responsible for other data controllers’ processing activities, and you should contact them directly for questions about how they process your personal information and about how to exercise your privacy rights in relation to such processing.
This Privacy Statement does not apply to certain processing activities where we are not the controller. For example, where Intuit processes personal information as a processor or service provider on behalf of our customers, including when we process personal information on behalf of customers of our professional tax software products. When we act as a processor or service provider, the privacy statement of the customer who uses our Services applies, instead of this Privacy Statement, and our processing of such personal information is governed by our agreements with such customers. If you have concerns about personal information that we process on behalf of a customer, or wish to exercise your privacy rights regarding such personal information, please contact the customer directly.
This Privacy Statement also does not apply to Intuit Financial Services or Intuit’s processing of education records subject to state or federal laws or children’s data in our education curriculum products. You may find the privacy statement for Intuit Financial Services
here
, and the privacy statement for Intuit for Education
here
.
If you have any questions about how Intuit processes your personal information, please see How to contact us below.
The Intuit platform
The Intuit Platform and your personal information
When we say “platform,” we mean that when you choose to share data with us, or bring over information from third parties (like a bank or loan provider), Intuit uses that data together, not just within the individual offering(s) you’re using. This means that, for example, we may use your bookkeeping details from QuickBooks, contact and purchase history details from Mailchimp, and/or recommendations from Credit Karma. The personal information we use in this centralized way may relate to you as an end user of our Services or as a customer or vendor of an Intuit customer whose personal information has been included in the Intuit Platform.
Business account information
Some experiences and services within the Intuit Platform allow you to interact with a business (such as your employer). If you are granted access to a business account (for example, in QuickBooks), the business owner or a designated administrator may control and administer details of your account, for example, by deciding your access rights; making decisions about your personal information (such as details about your payroll); or requiring you to take certain actions (for example, use location tracking to clock in for a shift). If the owner or designated administrator changes your access rights, then you may lose access to the information the business controls.
Your use of the Intuit Platform as part of a business account may be subject to the business’s policies, which may differ from this Privacy Statement. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of other businesses, and you should consider both the business’s policies and whether you are comfortable giving the business access to your personal information before connecting to their services.
Personal information we collect
The personal information that we collect or otherwise receive about you depends on the context of your interactions with Intuit, how you configure your account, and the choices you make, including your privacy settings. The way we process your personal information may also depend on the particular Services, functionalities, or experiences you use, your location, and applicable law.
Information you provide to us
You may provide us with your information as follows:
Contact data and account profile data.
We collect information when you (or your organization) create an account, activate a subscription, and/or upload information to the Intuit Platform. Personal information may include your name, previous name(s) and/or nicknames, title and honorifics, professional title and company name, education, billing and mailing addresses, phone number and email address, profile photo, billing information (your payment information), purchase history, demographic information, preferences, subscription data, and your username and account credentials.
Identity verification information.
We collect information to verify your identity, including your name, date of birth, social security number, social insurance number, driver’s license number, passport number, government-issued identification details, and similar information to verify your identity and to help you file your tax return.
Communications, feedback and survey data, and related data.
We may collect personal information such as your name, email address, telephone number and any other personal information you choose to share when you reach out to us for support, give us feedback, participate in optional surveys, attend our events, participate in product research or training, or otherwise interact or communicate with us. This information may include: call center recordings and call monitoring records, chat and text records, voicemails, photographs, and video images.
Marketing data.
You may provide us with your contact information and preferences for receiving marketing communications.
Social and community content.
We receive content you post on our social media pages and our community pages.
Business and financial information.
We may receive information about your business, your finances, expenses, invoices, financial statements, details of your financial transactions, payroll details, payment details, tax return details, details about your customers, vendors, or employees, income and wage information, and/or investment information.
Interactions with experts.
The Intuit Platform provides many opportunities for you to connect with live experts, including, for example, accountants or tax preparers. When you interact with these experts, we may receive information about the questions you ask, the details of your accounts, and the guidance provided to you.
Interactions with chatbots.
We may receive information from you through your use of chatbots, digital assistants, or other interactive bots across the Intuit Platform.
Device and contact data.
If you grant permission in your device settings, certain features may have access to your device and contacts.
Business connection data.
We may collect information about you when you interact with the Intuit Platform through our customers. If you are a customer, vendor or prospect of an Intuit customer and interact with the Intuit Platform (for example, to pay an invoice, make a purchase, interact with an email, provide contact details or complete a survey), we will use this information to make recommendations about you to our customers. Our customers may also provide business connection data directly about you to us; this is described below under ‘Other users’.
Third-party sources
The Intuit Platform is designed to help you connect with other people and businesses. As a result of those connections, others may be able to input personal information about you, including other customers using the Intuit Platform. For example, an Intuit customer may share personal information about you with us in order to use and benefit from the Intuit Platform. You also may be able to input or process personal information about others, for example, if you are an account administrator of one of our products or use Intuit to manage customer lists. If you input information about others into the Platform, you must only do so if you have first provided sufficient notice and received any required permissions, and have an appropriate legal basis if required by applicable law.
We may also receive personal information about you from other third parties where you have provided consent or where permitted by applicable law. We protect and process the personal information obtained from those third parties as described in this Privacy Statement, consistent with any additional restrictions imposed by the source of the information. Our third-party sources may vary over time and depend upon how you use the Intuit Platform. For example, we receive information from:
Linked third-party services.
If you choose to sync a non-Intuit account/service with your Intuit account, we will receive information from that account/service according to your settings with that account/service. This may include details of your bank account information, social media information, purchase history or your business’s sales records through a point of sale application.
Supplemental information and identity verification providers.
We work with certain third parties to help us verify your identity, the specifics of your business, and/or supplement the personal information you have provided and ensure the accuracy of your personal information. For example, we use third-party providers to validate your contact information (e.g., name, mailing address, email address, phone number) or to provide additional details about your business. These providers may include, for example, your financial institution, telecommunications provider, or email provider.
Customer support providers.
We receive personal information about you or your interaction with the Intuit Platform from certain third parties for troubleshooting purposes. For example, we may obtain information about your interaction(s) with customer support and information about technical issues you have raised, including call center recordings, call monitoring records, voicemails, photographs and chat records.
Credit bureaus and related third parties.
Many Intuit features rely on information we receive from credit bureaus and related third parties. For example, in some countries, we may offer free credit reports and credit scores. We request these reports and credit scores on your behalf from credit bureau partners, like TransUnion, Experian and Equifax. These partners may also provide personal information such as employment or income data, social security number, vehicle or driver information, or information about special offers available based on your credit profile so we can make more personalized recommendations for you.
Other users.
As described above, we may receive personal information about you from other Intuit Platform users, such as your accountant, bookkeeper, tax preparer, spouse, employer, or other business customers using the Intuit Platform (e.g., businesses from which you buy products or services, or with which you otherwise interact). We may also collect such personal information through features like member referral programs.
Risk management, cybersecurity & anti-fraud providers.
We may receive personal information from third parties that help us assess risks associated with our offerings, including to help combat fraud and illegal activity and to help protect your personal information.
Data providers.
We may receive information from information services and data licensors that provide demographic and preference information to us.
Content providers.
We may receive personal information from companies that make user-generated content from their service available to others, such as local business reviews or public social media posts.
Joint offering partners.
We may offer co-branded services or experiences or engage in joint-marketing activities with others, including through our conferences or live events.
Government agencies.
We receive information from government agencies, including from various tax agencies, such as your tax filing confirmation from the IRS.
Public information.
We collect individual and household demographic information and preference information from publicly available sources, such as open government databases, social media platforms, and others.
Automatic data collection
We, our service providers, and our business partners may automatically log personal information about you, your computer or mobile device, and your interaction over time with the Services, such as:
Device information.
We may collect information about your device(s) such as IP addresses, log information, error messages, device type, and unique device identifiers. For example, we may collect IP addresses from you as part of our sign in and security features.
Usage information.
We may collect information about your use of the Intuit Platform, such as the pages you viewed, the services and features you used or interacted with, your browser type, and details about any links or communications with which you interacted.
Location information.
Certain features in the Intuit Platform may collect your precise location information, device motion information, or both, if you or your organization grant(s) us permission to do so through your device settings (for example, if you use QuickBooks’ time-tracking service, participate in Karma Drive, or use CK Money to locate nearby ATMs).
Information stored locally.
Some of our web-enabled desktop services and offerings synchronize with the information on your computer. In doing so, we may collect information such as device information, product usage, and error reports. We may also store personal information locally on your device.
Communication interaction data.
We or our third-party service providers may collect information from email providers, communication providers and social networks, such as your interactions with our email, text or other communications (e.g., whether you open and/or forward emails) – we may do this through use of pixel tags (which are also known as clear GIFs), which may be embedded invisibly in our emails.
Online behavioral data
. We may automatically collect certain personal information about your use and interactions with our websites, customers’ websites or e-commerce stores, social media websites, and marketing campaigns that we or our customers organize, including device information (such as your IP address and unique device IDs), page view information and search results, links, and if you are a customer contact, whether or not a campaign presented or sent to you using our offerings has been viewed, delivered, opened, clicked on, whether it has bounced or was treated as spam.
Cookies and similar technologies
Intuit and our service providers may use commonly used tools such as cookies, web beacons, pixels, local shared objects and similar technologies (collectively “cookies”) to collect information about you (“
Cookie Information
”) so we can provide the experiences you request, recognize your visit, track your interactions, and improve your and other customers’ experiences. For example, we may use session-replay technologies,
such as those provided by FullStory and Medallia, that employ software code to record users’ interactions with the Services in a manner that allows us to watch video replays of those user sessions. The replays include users’ clicks, mobile app touches, mouse movements, scrolls and keystrokes/key touches during those sessions. These replays help us diagnose usability problems and identify areas for improvement. You can learn more about FullStory at
https://www.fullstory.com/legal/privacy-policy
and you can opt-out of session recording by FullStory at
https://www.fullstory.com/optout/
. You can learn more about Medallia at
https://www.medallia.com/privacy-policy/
.
You have control over some of the information we collect from Cookies and how we use it. Please see Your Personal Information Rights and Choices section for more information. For full details on how we use cookies and similar technologies please see our
Intuit Cookie Policy
. For full details on how we use cookies and similar technologies when you use or interact with our Mailchimp offerings, please also see our
Mailchimp Cookie Statement.
Biometric Information
Certain parts of the Intuit Platform make use of biometric personal information (“
Biometric Information
“). We will not collect your Biometric Information without first providing notice and obtaining your consent. For more details about how we use Biometric Information, please see our
Biometric Notice
.
How we use personal information
We may use your personal information in a number of ways or as otherwise described at the time of collection:
Service delivery and operations. We may use your personal information to:
Provide you with the Intuit Platform, create your account and manage our relationship with you
Run and manage our business, including resolving billing and financial disputes
Evaluate your eligibility for marketing offers, products and services
Provide features to you, such as your free credit reports and scores
Provide a product or service that you have requested through the Intuit Platform
Connect you with experts and other users
Communicate with you, such as sending you electronic notifications concerning your financial privacy
Understand your needs and interests, and personalize your experience with the Services and our communications.
Provide you with support and resolve disputes
Authenticate your identity
Manage event registrations and attendance, including sending related communications to you
Register visitors to our offices for security reasons and manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign
Research and development. We may use your personal information to:
Improve and develop our products and services by analyzing how they are used and interacted with, by training our artificial intelligence models and other machine learning models, as well as by assessing the use of and interactions with our Platform and certain content our customers send or display through the Platform, including by conducting data analytics to develop insights about you, your needs, and your preferences, so we can make more informed predictions, recommendations, and products for our customers.
Please note any data obtained through Google Workspace APIs is not used to develop, improve, or train any generalized AI and/or ML models. Any data originating from the Google Workspace API is instead ingested only by Intuit’s and our third-party providers’ artificial intelligence tools to deliver services on the customer’s behalf and to ensure safety, not for model retraining.
Combine and anonymize information about your interactions with Intuit to create aggregate, anonymized statistics for use in research (including by contracting with academic institutions) and for marketing, promoting, improving, and developing our platform.
Marketing and advertising. We, our service providers and our third-party advertising partners may collect and use your personal information for marketing and advertising purposes to:
Market services, products and experiences, including to deliver gifts and promotional materials, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications via email, post, telephone, SMS or push notifications, in accordance with your marketing preferences.
Personalize your experience and tailor recommendations, advertising, and offers presented to you, including through the development of insights about you and your needs based on your interactions with the Intuit Platform’s products, services, and offerings. These advertisements may be displayed to you on Intuit’s digital properties, including our websites and mobile apps, media platforms, connected devices, or other third-party platforms and channels.
Whistleblower Reporting.
When you report any concern of non-compliance, unethical conduct, or other alleged violation of our
Code of Conduct and Ethics
, personal information you provide will be processed as a part of the investigation of the allegations and retained in accordance with our internal policies until the investigation is complete. While we make every effort to maintain confidentiality, depending on the investigation, disclosing your identity to other individuals may be necessary.
Compliance and protection. We may use your personal information to:
Protect against misuse or abuse of our Services and ensure compliance with our Terms of Service, including in relation to content our customers send or display through the Platform
Comply with legal and regulatory requirements
Protect the rights, property, safety or security of the Intuit Platform, our customers, employees or others and prevent fraudulent or illegal activity
Exercise our rights in the course of judicial, administrative, or arbitration proceedings
Enforce, remedy, or apply our Terms of Service or other agreements
With your consent.
In some cases, we may specifically ask for your consent to use your personal information, such as when required by law.
We may process your personal information for other purposes that are compatible with the above purposes where permitted by applicable law.
Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Automated processing
When you use or interact with features on the Intuit Platform like chatbots, digital assistants, or other digital conversational experiences powered by artificial intelligence, we may process your personal information using automated and manual (human) methods. For example, when we use automated processing on your personal information to provide a more personalized and enhanced experience in the Intuit Platform, you may see instantly tailored recommendations and insights to manage your cash flow and grow your business. Or when we analyze personal information and transactions we have collected or received about you, we can provide you with personalized advice, predictions, recommendations and experiences, including showing your largest tax deductions, sharing how to get your largest tax refund, and providing personalized recommendations for credit products. Certain laws may provide you with the right to object to the automated processing of your personal information. Please review these rights in the “Region and state-specific terms” section below.
How we share your personal information
When you interact with our services.
We may share your personal information in the following circumstances:
For certain product features
. We may use third party API services, such as YouTube and Twilio, for certain product features. If you choose to use those features, you acknowledge and agree that you are also bound by the third party’s privacy policy. You may manage your YouTube API data by visiting Google’s security settings page
here
. You may make choices about your Twilio API data by visiting Twilio’s privacy notice
here
.
When you connect with an Intuit Platform partner.
You may be provided with offers, products, and services from third-party companies who integrate with our Intuit Platform. If you choose to interact with a platform partner, apply for their services or offerings, or otherwise link or sync your account to a platform partner’s product or service, you consent and direct us to share your personal information to the platform partner providing the service or offering. For example, when we send your personal information to partners in order to generate offers for you to review, when we send your application information directly to our partners, or when we send you to the partner’s site for you to provide the information directly to them.
In some cases, if you click through to go to a platform partner’s site, you will automatically be sending your personal information to that platform partner. When this happens, you will still have to submit your application on the platform partner’s site. Remember that any information you provide to a platform partner, whether through us or on your own, will be subject to their privacy practices and terms and conditions.
When you connect to your social media account.
Some of our features enable you to connect to a social media account or share information on social media platforms, like Facebook and Twitter. Any information you choose to share on social media may potentially be visible to a global audience and will be subject to the social media provider’s privacy policies (not this Privacy Statement). You should take care only to share information on social media that you are comfortable sharing.
For joint features, sales, promotions and events.
With your consent we may share your personal information with third parties who are jointly providing features, sales initiatives, promotions or events with us.
When you publicly post the information.
We may provide opportunities for you to publicly post reviews, questions, comments, suggestions, or other content that may include personal information, such as your name or username. Anything you share in a public forum is public, and you should think carefully before you decide to share.
With your wireless carrier.
When you use your wireless device in connection with the Intuit Platform, you authorize your wireless carrier to use or disclose information about your account and your wireless device, if available, to Intuit or its service provider for the duration of your business relationship, solely to help them identify you or your wireless device and to prevent fraud.
When you participate in the short code program
. Personal information collected through the short code program (i.e., when you sign up for SMS texts), will not be shared, sold, or rented to affiliated or unaffiliated third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Other circumstances.
We also share your personal information with third parties in the following circumstances.
For research.
With appropriate controls, we may share information with third parties, such as academic institutions, government and non-profit organizations, for research purposes or to publish academic or policy-related materials. We only share information in a way that does not identify any individual.
With financial services providers.
In connection with our financial products, we may share personal information with collection agencies, credit bureaus and loan services providers, and payment card association members. We may also share your personal information with other companies, lawyers, credit bureaus, agents, government agencies, and card associations in connection with issues related to fraud, credit, defaults, or debt collection.
With service providers or agents.
We share personal information with our service providers or agents who provide services on our behalf for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement. Service providers or agents are required to implement reasonable privacy and information protection controls to maintain the privacy and security of information provided to them consistent with the privacy practices outlined in this Privacy Statement. Service providers or agents may include companies that assist us with our advertising, marketing, and sales efforts, help us with our technology offerings (such as a hosting, security or anti-fraud providers) and help us run our business. Service providers or agents also include AI providers, including generative AI providers.
For mergers and acquisitions.
If we are involved with a merger, asset sale, financing, liquidation, bankruptcy, or the acquisition of all or part of our business to another company, we may share your personal information with that company and its advisors before and after the transaction date.
With our affiliates and subsidiaries and your right to limit information sharing.
We may share your personal information with our affiliates and subsidiaries for everyday business purposes as described in this Statement, including for marketing purposes, for improving and developing our offerings, and for personalizing your experience on our Platform. Certain laws may provide you with the right to limit our information sharing activities in certain circumstances. Please review these rights in the “Region and state-specific terms” section below.
For advertising and analytics.
Intuit may use advertising networks and other providers to display advertising on our Intuit Platform or on other sites. Intuit may share personal information with advertising networks and other providers to tailor advertising and offers presented to you based on your interactions with the Intuit Platform’s products, services, and offerings. Our advertising partners may place cookies on unaffiliated websites in order to serve advertisements that may be relevant to you based on your browsing activities and interests and determine the effectiveness of such advertisements. See also the “Region and state-specific terms” section below for additional information.
Intuit (excluding Credit Karma) responds to the Global Privacy Control signal for US residents, as described further in the United States section below. However, we do not respond to “Do Not Track” signals because there is no formal “Do Not Track” standard.
For legal reasons.
We may share your personal information with third parties for legal reasons without your consent, and as permitted by law, including:
When we reasonably believe disclosure is required in order to comply with a subpoena, court order, or other applicable law, regulation or legal process;
To protect the rights, property, or safety of Intuit, TurboTax, the Intuit Platform, our customers or others;
To protect or defend against attacks;
To enforce, remedy, or apply our Terms of Service or other agreements;
To prevent fraud, cybersecurity attacks or illegal activity;
For debt collection; and
With regulatory agencies, including government tax agencies, as necessary to help detect and combat fraud and/or protect our customers, users and/or the Intuit Platform, or in required institutional risk control programs.
Your personal information rights and choices
Your choices
At Intuit, we believe that you have choices about information that pertains to you or your business.
We provide all customers, including those in the EU, UK (and Gibraltar), and Switzerland, with options to manage the privacy of their personal information.
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Correct your personal information.
You can edit and correct certain personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Access your personal information.
You may download a copy of the personal information we have about you by visiting your account, the
Intuit Privacy Center
, or by calling us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
(for US members), the
Credit Karma UK Help Centre
(for Credit Karma UK members), or the
Credit Karma Canada Help Centre
(for Credit Karma Canada members). If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Delete your personal information.
You may ask us to delete your personal information by visiting your account settings or the
Intuit Privacy Center
or calling us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
(for US members), the
Credit Karma UK Help Centre
(for Credit Karma UK members), or the
Credit Karma Canada Help Centre
(for Credit Karma Canada members). If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, please visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of interest based advertising by visiting the
NAI Opt-Out Page
or the
Choices Opt-Out Page
(or the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada Opt-Out Page
, if you are based in Canada) or by visiting the
Intuit Privacy Center
. If you reside in California, Connecticut, Colorado, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, please refer to the relevant sections below under Region and state-specific terms for more information about opting out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes,or opting-out of sales and/or sharing.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings or you may use the links below. You may also unsubscribe using the link found at the bottom of all marketing and promotional emails. If you receive marketing text messages from us through Intuit’s SMS shortcode program, you may opt out of receiving further marketing text messages from us by replying STOP to the message.
For more information, please visit:
Intuit
communications preferences
Credit Karma US
and
Credit Karma UK
communications preferences
Mailchimp
communications preferences
Your Rights
Depending on where you live, you may also have certain state- or country-specific rights with respect to your personal information. Please see the Region and state-specific terms section for your country, below.
Verification
To help protect privacy and the security of your personal information, you may be asked to provide additional information to verify your identity and/or ownership rights before we can fulfill your data rights request. If we cannot verify your identity or your ownership rights to the data, we may not be able to service your request until you provide proper documentation.
Data retention
Unless you specifically ask us to delete your personal information, we retain your personal information as long as it is necessary to comply with our data retention requirements and provide you with services and the benefits of the Intuit Platform and successfully run our business. Even if you submit a deletion request, we may be required to maintain your personal information for as long as necessary to:
comply with our legal or regulatory compliance needs (e.g., maintaining records of transactions you have made with us);
to exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and/or
to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on our service.
This means we may keep different information for different periods. If your account is canceled because you haven’t used it for a long time, we may delete this information immediately.
There may be occasions where we are unable to fully delete, anonymize, or de-identify your personal information due to technical, legal, regulatory compliance, or other operational reasons. Where this is the case, we will take reasonable measures to securely isolate your personal information from any further processing until such time as we are able to delete, anonymize, or de-identify it.
International data transfers
Unless you have provided us with consent to transfer your personal information, US Tax Preparation Information shall be processed and stored in the United States in accordance with applicable law.
With the exception noted above, Intuit reserves the right to store and process your personal information in the United States and in any other country where Intuit or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or service providers operate facilities in accordance with and as permitted by applicable laws and regulations. Some of these countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective).
When we transfer, store or process personal information outside of your jurisdiction (including to or in the United States, as described above), we take appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information remain protected in accordance with this Privacy Statement and applicable law.
Some of these recipients of your personal information are located in countries for which the European Commission, the UK (and Gibraltar) Government, and the Swiss Government (as and where applicable) have issued adequacy decisions, which means that these countries are recognized as providing an adequate level of data protection under applicable UK (and Gibraltar), European, and Swiss data protection laws and the transfer is therefore permitted under Article 45 of the GDPR.
Other recipients of your personal information are located in countries outside the EEA and/or the UK that are not the subject of an adequacy decision. In these cases, we may use the Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission or, as may be applicable, the International Data Transfer Agreement approved by the UK Government, to help ensure your personal information is protected. For more information on the transfer safeguards we rely on, please contact us by using the details in the “How to contact us” section below.
Intuit (excluding Credit Karma) and Mailchimp comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Union (EU), the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar), and Switzerland to the United States. Intuit and Mailchimp rely on the EU-U.S. DPF to transfer data and will rely on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF once approved by the appropriate authorities. We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission. You can find more information about Intuit’s and Mailchimp’s Data Privacy Framework certification
here
.
Security of your personal information
We use reasonable physical, technical and organizational safeguards that are designed to protect your personal information. However, despite these controls, we cannot completely ensure or warrant the security of your personal information. You can find out more about how we protect your personal information
here
.
Changes to our Privacy Statements
From time to time we may change or update our Privacy Statement. We reserve the right to make changes or updates at any time. If we make material changes to the way we process your personal information, we will notify you by posting a notice in the Intuit Platform or on a community post; by sending you a notification; or by other means consistent with applicable law.
You can see when this Privacy Statement was last updated by checking the “last updated” date at the top of this Privacy Statement. Please review this Privacy Statement periodically to stay informed about how Intuit protects your privacy.
Children
Our services are not intended for or directed to children under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children. If you believe we may have information from a child, please contact us.
How to contact us
If you have questions or comments about this Privacy Statement or our practices, please contact us.
You can submit Intuit privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
You can submit Credit Karma privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
You can submit Mailchimp privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
If you have an unresolved privacy or information use concern or complaint that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Region and state-specific terms
Additional terms may apply to you based upon the country you reside in or the products you use. Please click the region or state that applies to you to learn more about additional terms and rights that may apply to you.
Expand All
Collapse All
United States
If you are a resident of the United States, you may have the following rights and choices:
US Tax Preparation Information
Except as necessary to provide you with tax preparation services or as authorized by law, we will not use or disclose your Tax Preparation Information – including to Intuit’s affiliates and subsidiaries – unless you consent.
If you agree to share your Tax Preparation Information for purposes other than tax preparation services, including by sharing it with the Intuit Platform, your Tax Preparation Information will be handled in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act
Intuit is a financial institution subject to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA).
By using, accessing, or interacting with the Intuit Platform, you are consenting to receive notices about your financial privacy electronically.
Please find our GLBA Notice
here
.
California Residents
Scope.
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Information of California residents in our capacity as a “business” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”) and your rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, the term “
Personal Information
” has the meaning given in the CCPA, but does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of personal information and certain Intuit companies from all or certain parts of the CCPA, such as information subject to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) and other data protection laws. In some cases, we may provide a different privacy notice to certain categories of California residents, such as employees and job applicants, in which case that notice will apply instead of this section.
Personal Information that we collect, use, and disclose.
The chart
here
summarizes the Personal Information we collect by reference to the categories of Personal Information specified in the CCPA, and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Statement. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described in this chart.
Your California privacy rights. As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access.
You may request that we provide the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information during the past 12 months:
○              the categories of Personal Information we have collected about you,
○              the sources from which that information was collected,
○              the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, and/or sharing your Personal Information,
○              the categories of personal information we shared or sold about you,
○              the categories of third parties to whom we shared or sold personal information about you,
○              the categories of personal information we disclosed for a business purpose, and
○              the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed personal information about you for a business purpose.
Request a copy of your Personal Information.
You may request a copy of the Personal Information in
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Correction.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the personal information you have provided to us. You may delete your personal information in the Privacy section of
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Opt-out of Sales and/or Sharing.
Like many companies, Intuit and Mailchimp use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you as described above. The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) may classify our use of some of these services as “sharing” your Personal Information with the advertising partners that provide the services. You can opt-out of the “sharing” of your personal information by visiting the “Your California Privacy Rights” link in the footer of the Intuit website.
In addition, if you have enabled a recognized opt-out mechanism on your browser, device, or platform, you will automatically be opted out of any “sharings” when you interact with our Services. Please go here to learn more about enabling one such preference signal, the Global Privacy Control:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#download
. Intuit and Mailchimp do not sell personal information under the CCPA. Credit Karma does not sell or share personal information subject to the CCPA, and therefore does not offer a “Your California Privacy Rights” link on its website. We do not knowingly sell or share the personal information of individuals under 16 years of age.
Limit processing of sensitive personal information.
Some of the personal information that we may collect are considered sensitive personal information under the CCPA. We collect sensitive personal information for the purposes allowed by law or with your consent. We only use sensitive personal information as necessary for our (1) Service delivery and operations, (2) compliance and protection, (3) research and development, or (4) Service improvement and analytics purposes in accordance with CCPA. If we use sensitive personal information outside the permitted purposes of the CCPA, we will provide you with the right to limit processing of sensitive personal information.
California Shine the Light.
Customers who are California residents may request certain information concerning the categories of personal information (if any) we disclose to third parties or affiliates for their direct marketing purposes. If you would like more information, please submit a written request to us using the contact information provided below.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination or retaliation related to your exercise of any of your California privacy rights.
Verification.
In order to protect your personal information from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional personal information for verification. For Credit Karma members, we may require that you confirm certain pieces of personal information that we have on file and/or log into your Credit Karma account. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
Authorized agents.
You may use an authorized agent to submit a rights request. If you do so, the authorized agent must present signed written authorization to act on your behalf, and you will also be required to independently verify your own identity directly with us and confirm with us that you provided the authorized agent permission to submit the rights request. This verification process is not necessary if your authorized agent provides documentation showing that the authorized agent has power of attorney to act on your behalf under Cal. Prob. Code §§ 4121 to 4130.
Learn more about instructions for authorized agents.
We may deny a request from an agent that does not submit adequate proof that they have been authorized by you to act on your behalf.
Transparency matters.
Learn more about the requests we process by viewing our
Privacy Rights Transparency Report
.
Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia Residents
Scope.
This section applies only to the residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, and Virginia. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Data of state residents described in this subsection in our capacity as a business or controller under the corresponding state privacy laws, including Colorado Privacy Rights Act, Connecticut Data Privacy Act, Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act, Oregon Consumer Privacy Act, Texas Data Privacy and Security Act, Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, “Applicable State Privacy Laws”), and your rights with respect to that Personal Data. For purposes of this section, the term “Personal Data” has the meaning given in the Applicable State Privacy Laws but does not include information or entities exempted from the scope of the Applicable State Privacy Laws, such as those subject to GLBA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of personal information and certain Intuit companies from all or certain parts of the Applicable State Privacy Laws.
Personal Information that we collect, use, and disclose
. The chart
here
summarizes the Personal Information we collect and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Statement. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described in this chart.
Your privacy rights.
As a resident of Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, you may have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access
. You may request a copy of the Personal Information in
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Correction
. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the personal information you have provided to us. You may delete your personal information in the Privacy section of
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes
. You can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Manage Cookies” or “Privacy Settings” link in the footer of the Intuit website. For Mailchimp, you can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Cookie Preferences” link in the footer of the
Mailchimp website
. Intuit, Mailchimp and Credit Karma do not otherwise “sell your Personal Data to third parties for monetary consideration.
Opt-out of profiling
. You can opt-out of the automated processing of your Personal Data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements, to the extent this results in decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects.
Sensitive Personal Data
. Some of the personal information that we may collect may be considered sensitive personal information under certain state privacy laws. We will not process your sensitive personal data without your consent.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination related to your exercise of any of your privacy rights.
Appeal
. If we decline to take action on any request that you submit in connection with the rights described above, you may ask that we reconsider our response by submitting a written request to us using the contact information provided below. We will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is denied, we will also provide you with an online mechanism, if available, or other method through which you may contact your state attorney general’s office to submit a complaint.
Authentication.
In order to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect that your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional personal information for verification. For Credit Karma members, we may require that you confirm certain pieces of personal information that we have on file and/or log into your Credit Karma account. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
Transparency matters.
Learn more about the requests we process by viewing our
Privacy Rights Transparency Report
.
United States contact information:
Intuit Inc.
Attention: Privacy
2800 E Commerce Center Place
Tucson, AZ 85706
You can contact the Intuit Data Protection Officer
here.
Credit Karma LLC
Attention: Legal Department
PO Box 30963
Oakland CA 94604
legal@creditkarma.com
Mailchimp
The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
Attn: Privacy Officer
405 North Angier Ave. NE,
Atlanta, GA 30308
You can contact the Mailchimp Data Protection Officer
here
.
Australia
If you are a resident of Australia, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services. To make a request for access or deletion of your personal information, contact us through the link below.
Objection and Restriction.
You may object to our processing of your personal information, including for marketing purposes, or ask us to restrict processing of your personal information. To object to data processing or request a restriction, contact us through the link below. If you request that we stop processing some or all of your personal information or you withdraw (where applicable) your consent for our use or disclosure of your personal information for purposes set out in this privacy notice, we might not be able to provide you all of the Services and customer support offered to our users and authorized under this Notice.
Australia contact information:
Visit the QuickBooks Australia website to learn how to contact their support team.
Go to QuickBooks Australia
Intuit Australia Pty. Limited
Level 34, 1 O'Connell St.
Sydney, NSW 2000 Australia
Canada
While we take steps to maintain protection of your personal information, your personal information may be disclosed in response to valid demands or requests from governments, regulators, courts and law enforcement authorities in those other jurisdictions or countries.
If you are a resident of Canada, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings. You may also click unsubscribe at the bottom of the marketing emails.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of interest based advertising by visiting the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada Opt-Out Page
,
NAI Opt-Out Page
and the
Choices Opt-Out Page
.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may make a request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information (provided we no longer have a business need to retain your personal information). You may request a copy of the Personal Information or delete the personal information in
your Intuit account
. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services. Even if you request for your personal information to be deleted, certain aspects may be retained for us to: meet our legal or regulatory compliance (e.g. maintaining records of transactions you have made with us); exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on the Intuit Platform. Data retained for these purposes will be handled as described in “Data Retention”.
Withdraw consent.
You can withdraw your consent at any time to collection, use and disclosure of your personal information. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint.
You have the right to file a complaint with the applicable Privacy Commissioner about our collection and processing of your personal information.
Canada contact information:
Intuit Canada
Attention: Privacy
8 Spadina Ave.
Suite 1900
Toronto, Ontario
M5V 0S8
You can contact the Intuit Data Protection Officer
here
.
Credit Karma LLC
Attention: Privacy Officer
PO Box 30963
Oakland CA 94604
legal@creditkarma.com
If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, you can visit the
Credit Karma Help Centre
.
You can also email the Credit Karma Canada Privacy Officer by writing to
legal@creditkarma.ca
.
The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
Attn: Privacy Officer
405 North Angier Ave. NE,
Atlanta, GA 30308 USA
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you can visit the
Mailchimp Help Centre
,
or submit a question
here
.
India
Where data of Indian individuals are involved, you hereby agree that the “reasonable security practices and procedures” under section 43A Explanation (ii) of the Information Technology Act, 2000 means this Intuit’s Privacy Statement and such data security procedures that Intuit may implement from time to time and which may, in Intuit’s discretion, be informed to you from time to time.
What you can do to manage your privacy
You have choices when it comes to managing the privacy of your personal information.
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings.
Correct your personal information.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
India contact information
Visit the QuickBooks India website to learn how to contact their support team.
Go to QuickBooks India
Intuit Technology Services Private Limited
Campus 4A, PrITech Park (Ecospace)
7th and 8th Floor, Belandur Village
Varthur Hobli, Bangalore East Taluk
Bangalore - 560 103 India
United Kingdom (and Gibraltar)(UK), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland
Personal Information
References to “personal information” in this Privacy Statement are equivalent to “personal data” governed by EU and UK data protection laws. Essentially, “personal data” is information about an individual, where that individual is either directly identified or can be identified. It does not include ‘anonymous data’ (i.e., information where the identity of an individual has been permanently removed).
Legal Basis of Processing
We use your personal information only as permitted by law. Applicable EEA, UK(and Gibraltar) and Swiss data protection law requires us to have a “legal basis” for each purpose for which we collect your personal information. Our legal basis for collecting and using the personal information described in this Privacy Statement will depend on the type of personal information and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we will normally process personal information from you when:
We have your consent to do so;
We have a contract with you and it is necessary to process your personal information to perform our contract with you, including to provide you with the benefits of the Intuit Platform and operate our business;
The processing is in our legitimate business interests, such as operating our businesses, improving and developing the Intuit Platform, communicating with you, marketing our offerings and services and personalizing your experience, and to detect illegal activities; and/or
To comply with legal requirements, including applicable laws and regulations.
For residents in the UK searching for financial or other products (including energy, internet, or mobile phone offers) through the Intuit Platform, we may share your personal information, including your contact details, date of birth, as well as the information you give us about your employment, income, and housing and employment expenses with third parties, including HD Decisions, Capital One, Monevo, CarFinance 247, and Decision Tech. You can find more information about their data protection practices in their privacy policies:
HD Decisions
Capital One
Monevo
CarFinance 247
Decision Tech
If you are a resident of the UK(and Gibraltar), the EEA or Switzerland you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information.
You may request a copy of your personal information in the Privacy tab of your account or by visiting our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU&Switzerland). If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma UK, you may request a copy of your personal information by visiting Credit Karma’s
Help Centre
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you may request a copy of your personal information by visiting
Mailchimp’s Privacy Rights Request page
.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
You may request for us to delete your personal information in the Privacy tab of your account or through our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland). If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma UK, you may request for us to delete your personal information by visiting Credit Karma’s
Help Centre
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you may request for us to delete your personal information by visiting
Mailchimp’s Privacy Rights Request page
. Please note that even if you request for your personal information to be deleted, certain aspects may be retained for us to: meet our legal or regulatory compliance (e.g. maintaining records of transactions you have made with us); exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on our Service. Data retained for these purposes will be handled as described in the section “Data Retention”.
Objection and Restriction.
You may object to our processing of your personal information or ask us to restrict processing of your personal information.
Portability.
You may request portability of your personal information.
Withdraw Consent.
If we process your personal information with your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint.
You have the right to file a complaint with a supervisory authority about our collection and processing of your personal information. You can find your data protection regulator
here
.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings or visit our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland) or
edit your email preferences for Mailchimp using the instructions found here.
. You may also click unsubscribe at the bottom of the marketing emails.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of such interest-based advertising by visiting
Network Advertising Initiative
or
Your Online Choices
or by visiting our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland). For Mailchimp, you can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Cookie Preferences” link in the footer of the
Mailchimp website
.
UK, EEA and Swiss Representative
In the EEA: Intuit Inc., Intuit Limited and Mailchimp have each appointed Intuit France SAS as its Representative in the European Union in accordance with Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (the "GDPR") (contact details can be found in the section below).
In the UK: Intuit Inc., and Mailchimp have each appointed Intuit Limited as its Representative in the UK in accordance with UK GDPR (contact details can be found in the section below)
United Kingdom, EEA and Switzerland contact information
Intuit Limited
Attention: Intuit Data Protection Administration,
Cardinal Place, 80 Victoria Street, London,
United Kingdom, SW1E 5JL
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/uk/gdpr/
Credit Karma UK Limited
4th Floor
One New Oxford Street
London WC1A 1NU
Intuit France SAS
Intuit Data Protection Administration
﻿7 Rue Meyerbeer 75009 Paris, France
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/fr/gdpr/
or
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/eu/gdpr/
If you have questions or concerns that have not been addressed by this Privacy Statement, you can contact the Intuit and Mailchimp Data Protection Officer
here
,
the Credit Karma Data Protection Officer by writing to
dpo@creditkarma.com
.
Sub-policy 6
https://tally.so/help/privacy-policy:
Help Center
Get started
Features
Integrations
Guides
Plans & pricing
Resources
FAQ
Contact support
What's new
Roadmap
Feature requests
Privacy Notice - Tally tool
Version 1.0 - 09/09/2024
📋 2-minute summary
Article 1 - General
Article 2 – What personal data does Tally collect
Article 3 – The legal based and purposes of data processing
3.1 	General purposes
3.2 	Direct Marketing
3.3 	Transfer to third parties
3.4 	Legal requirements
Article 4 –  The duration of the processing
Article 5 – Your rights
5.1 	Right of access and right to obtain a copy
5.2 	Right to rectification, erasure or restriction
5.3	Right to object
5.4	Right to data portability
5.5	Right to withdraw consent
5.6 	Automated decisions and profiling
5.7 	Exercising your rights
5.8.  Right to file a complaint:
Article 6 – Safety and confidentiality
Article 7 – Applicable law and jurisdiction
📋 2-minute summary
We take our obligation to protect your privacy seriously!
That is why we provide you with this 2-minute summary, containing the necessary information on how we process your Personal Data.
What you should know:
First of all : you always remain in control of your data.
To whom does this Privacy Notice apply?
This notice applies to any individual whose Personal Data Tally may collect, use or otherwise process during their use of our tool.
What information do we collect about you?
Your (professional) identification details and additional account information
Your payment information
Information about how you make use of our tool
Why do we collect this information?
We collect your information in order to provide you access to our tool in an optimal way, in accordance with our Terms and Conditions, through a personalized user profile.
Who has access to your data?
Only the relevant part of Tally‘s team has access to the information you provide us with.
Furthermore, we use some suppliers and service providers, such as but not limited to computer security, digital solutions and web hosting services. These parties are legally obliged to ensure your privacy at all times, and will only process data in accordance with our purposes.
Finally, we may commission a third party to process your data. However, they can only do this for aforementioned purposes and upon our instructions and signature of a data processing agreement.
What do you control?
At any moment, you can request to modify, erase or get a copy of your data. To do so, we kindly request you to follow the procedure as described in our full Privacy Notice under Article 5.7.
What do we do to protect your data?
We adopted appropriate safety measures on a technical and an organizational level.
Your data is stored on high-security servers within the European Union.
In order to improve our tool and ensure its safety, Tally may need to use the data you have provided us. However, at all times, Tally shall use this data in a GDPR-compliant manner, using state of the art software and solutions.
We have implemented internal procedures to ensure the confidentiality of our IT-infrastructure and to make sure it is managed responsibly.
If you want to know more: we invite you to read our entire Privacy Notice below, which explains everything in further detail.
Tally makes it a matter of utmost importance to respect the privacy of the users of its tool. We are committed to treat your Personal Data in the strictest confidentiality, in accordance with the data protection legislation in force and the present Privacy Notice (hereinafter the “
Privacy Notice
”).
This Privacy Notice is intended to inform you, in a transparent manner, about the data we collect, the purpose for collecting it, the way we use it and the rights you have regarding the processing of such data.
You are not obliged to provide us your Personal Data, however understand that in some cases we will not be able to carry out the requested business activities or provide you the requested information in case you refuse to provide us certain Personal Data.
Tally reserves the right to change, modify and update this Privacy Notice from time to time by posting a revised version in its tool. Therefore, we recommend you regularly consult this Privacy Notice, to make sure that you are aware of all changes.
If you have any other questions, please do not hesitate to contact us at the following address:
hello@tally.so
.
Article 1 - General
Tally BV, (hereinafter, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”, “
Tally
”), with registered office at August Van Lokerenstraat 71, 9050 Ghent, Belgium and registered with the Crossroads Bank for Enterprises under enterprise number 0776.979.007, assumes responsibility for the processing of your Personal Data as "
Controller
", including the use of our tool (hereinafter: “
Tool
”)
In our Privacy Notice,
“Personal Data”
shall mean any information relating to you as an identified or identifiable natural person and user of the Tool.
Tally processes Personal Data in accordance with the legislation in force, and, in particular, Regulation 2016/679 of 27 April 2016 on the protection of individuals with regard to the processing of Personal Data and the free movement of such data, applicable from 25 May 2018 (hereinafter the "
GDPR
").
The access to or use of our Tool implies your full and unreserved understanding of this Privacy Notice. This means that you were fully informed to how Tally collects, uses and processes your Personal Data, in accordance with the provisions of this Privacy Notice and for the purposes listed in this Privacy Notice.
Article 2 – What personal data does Tally collect
2.1
Tally may process, for the purposes mentioned in Article 3, the following categories of Personal Data of you as a user of our Tool:
Data
Details
Context
Category 1
(Professional) identification data and additional account information
• Name
• E-mail address
• Password hash
Optional:
• Work industry
• Role at work
• Channel where you discovered Tally
When creating an account in order to make use of our Tool, we may process your Personal Data.
Category 2
Payment information
• Credit card information
• VAT number (in case of a company)
When selecting a paid subscription plan to make use of our Tool, we may process your Personal Data.
Category 3
Information about your usage of the Tool
Information related to your use of the Tool, such as:
• Features and functionalities used
• Any personal preferences or settings
• ...
Information about your usage of the Tool will be processed when you make use of the Tool.
Article 3 – The legal based and purposes of data processing
We only process your data when we have a specific purpose and lawful basis to do so and only process what is relevant for the pursuit of each specific purpose in question, in particular:
3.1 	General purposes
Data
Legal basis
Purpose
Category 1
(Professional) identification data and additional account information
Performance of a contract 
Terms and Conditions concluded between you and Tally
Tally may process your Personal Data of Category 1 in order to create a personalized user profile through which you will be able to make use of our Tool.
Category 2
Payment information
Performance of a contract 
Terms and Conditions concluded between you and Tally
Tally may process your Personal Data of Category 2 for payment and invoicing purposes when you have selected a paid subscription plan to make use of our Tool.
Category 3
Information about your usage of the Application
Our legitimate interest
Tally may process information about your usage of our Tool in order to pursue our legitimate interests of improving our services, providing technical support and ensuring the functionality and security of the Tool.
3.2 	Direct Marketing
If Tally has obtained your electronic contact details in the context of providing our services, Tally may use your electronic contact details to send you, via e-mail, promotional material regarding similar services we may offer. This is based on Tally’s legitimate interest.
Other promotional material, concerning non-similar services we may offer, will only be sent to you if you have given us your prior consent to do so.
Tally may also transfer some of your Personal Data to its Data Processors, for direct marketing purposes relating to Tally’s services.
We will at all times offer you a GDPR-compliant way to opt out of receiving such emails at any time, free of charge and without motivation, for example by clicking the unsubscribe button at the end of every promotional email or by sending an email to hello@tally.so.
3.3 	Transfer to third parties
Tally treats Personal Data as confidential information and will not disclose or communicate them to third parties under any condition or for any purpose other than those specified in this Privacy Notice, or under the conditions in which the law requires us to do so.
Tally may disclose your Personal Data to third parties to the extent that this is necessary to be able to carry out our business activities, including but not limited to suppliers and service providers that offer services related to IT-support, hosting, computer security or other specific services. In any case, these third parties will not disclose your Personal Data to other third parties, except in the following situations:
the communication of your Personal Data by such third parties to their suppliers or subcontractors is necessary to be able to carry out our business activities;
such third parties are obliged by applicable law or regulations to communicate certain information or documents to the competent authorities.
In case of non-payment or intentional misuse, Tally may disclose your Personal Data to authorized persons or agencies determined by law.
Tally will not sell or hire out your Personal Data to third parties, except in the situations described in this Privacy Notice or unless you explicitly provide your prior consent.
In the event of total or partial reorganization of Tally, transfer of Tally's activities or in the event of Tally being declared bankrupt, your Personal Data may be transferred to new entities or third parties. Tally will inform you in advance of the fact that Tally transfers your Personal Data to such third parties.
3.4 	Legal requirements
In extraordinary circumstances it may occur that Tally is obliged to transfer your Personal Data following a court order, or in order to comply with imperative laws and/or regulations. Tally will, if reasonably possible, try to inform you or your employer beforehand, unless revealing this information is subject to legal constraints.
Article 4 –  The duration of the processing
Tally will store your Personal Data for the duration necessary to achieve the purposes listed in Article 3 of this Privacy Notice, including for as long as this is essential for the contractual relationship between you and Tally.
Tally may also store your Personal Data in order to comply with applicable laws or as part of legal requirements, including storage obligations after the termination of the contractual relationship between you and Tally. Therefore, the retention periods mentioned below shall not apply where Tally is legally obliged to store your Personal Data for shorter or longer periods of time, including by applicable statutes of limitation for invoicing, payment, accounting, tax and regulatory compliance.
Retention periods
Data
Retention period
Category 1
(Professional) identification data and additional account information
Your Personal Data contained in Category 1 will be retained for 90 days the deletion of your user profile (which indicates the end of our contractual relationship).
Category 2
Payment information
Your Personal Data contained in Category 2 will be retained for seven (7) years after the deletion of your user profile (which indicates the end of our contractual relationship)
Category 3
Information about your usage of the Application
Your Personal Data contained in Category 3 will be retained for two (2) years after the deletion of your user profile (which indicates the end of our contractual relationship).
Article 5 – Your rights
5.1 	Right of access and right to obtain a copy
At any time, you have the right to freely obtain access to your Personal Data, as well as to be informed about the purpose of the processing.
5.2
Right to rectification, erasure or restriction
You always have the right to ask to rectify your Personal Data when you think it is inaccurate.
You can also request the processing of your Personal Data to be restricted if you think that your data is inaccurate, and you subsequently have made notification of this.
In addition, you have the right to ask to erase your Personal Data in as far it is not possible to anonymize it.
5.3	Right to object
You have the right to object to the processing of your Personal Data when you have and provide serious and legitimate reasons to do so.
You also have the right to object to the use of your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes. In such case, you do not need to provide a specific reasoning for your objection.
5.4	Right to data portability
You have the right to obtain your Personal Data, which is processed by our Tool in a structured, commonly used format and/or to transfer this data to another data controller.
5.5	Right to withdraw consent
When the processing of your Personal Data is based on your prior consent, you have the right to withdraw this consent at any time.
5.6 	Automated decisions and profiling
You have the right to request not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affects you.
5.7
Exercising your rights
You can exercise your rights by contacting us with a copy of the essential parts of your ID, such as name and date of birth, as attachment:
Either through e-mail to hello@tally.so.
Or via ordinary mail to:
Tally BV
August Van Lokerenstraat 71
9050 Ghent Belgium
5.8.  Right to file a complaint:
You have the right to file a complaint with the supervising Data Protection Authority:
Data Protection Authority,
Drukpersstraat 35, 1000 Brussel,
Tel: +32 (0)2 274 48 00, Fax: +32 (0)2 274 48 35,
Email: contact(at)apd-gba.be
This is without prejudice to proceedings before the civil courts. If you are from an EU Member State other than Belgium, you may also file a complaint with your national data protection authority (a list of the data protection authority for each EU-member state can be found here:
https://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
).
If you have suffered damage as a result of the processing of your Personal Data, you may file a claim for compensation.
Article 6 – Safety and confidentiality
Tally has adopted safety measures which are suited on a technical, organizational and physical level to avoid the destruction, the loss, the forgery, the adjustment, the non-authorized access or the notification of the Personal Data by accident to a third party, as well as the non-authorized processing of these data.
Nevertheless, if these events would occur and would affect your Personal Data, Tally will inform of the breach without undue delay, including a summary description of the potential impact and a recommendation on measures to mitigate the possible adverse effects of the breach.
Tally shall not be liable in any way for direct or indirect damages caused by a wrongfully or improper use of the Personal Data by a third party.
At the same time, you also share responsibility for maintaining the privacy and security of the services, for example: by not allowing any third party to have insight in your confidential communication(s).
Article 7 – Applicable law and jurisdiction
This Privacy Notice is managed, interpreted and executed in accordance with Belgian law which exclusively applies to every potential dispute.
The courts of Ghent have exclusive jurisdiction to settle any dispute arising out of or in connection to the interpretation or execution of the present Privacy Notice.
Help
Sub-policy 7
https://www.groovehq.com/our/privacy:
🎉 Discover Groove's sister company: Helply.com – the AI CX platform that automates 70%+ of tier-1 support.
Learn more →
Ready to get started with Groove?
No credit card required
Full access to all features
2 minute setup
Start your 90 day free trial
Book a demo
Groove’s privacy policy
Version 31th January, 2024
Contents
We are GDPR ready and compliant
Visitors data
Tracking
Cookies
Right to withdraw consent
Privacy Shield
Groove is a hosted web application ("Service") developed and maintained by Groove Networks, LLC., doing business as "Groove".
We care about your personal data you entrust us with. Demonstrating Groove’s engagement in personal data protection we are bringing you the key facts about how we handle personal data processing in Groove.
We are GDPR ready and compliant
GDPR is the REGULATION (EU) 2016/679 OF THE EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT AND OF THE COUNCIL of 27 April 2016 on the protection of natural persons with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data, and repealing Directive 95/46/EC (General Data Protection Regulation).
1. Data Protection Officer
Groove Networks LLC, 2 Dearborn St. Newport, RI United States is a data controller and a processor of personal data provided in Service.
Groove has its headquarters in the USA, which is why we have appointed a representative and internal data protection officer (“
DPO
”) for you to contact if you have any questions or concerns about Groove’s personal data policies or practices.
You can reach out to our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
2. What do we do:
We provide a web application for help desk support.  The main activity of Groove is gathering Your data from various channels (like email, twitter, facebook or widget you embed on your site - for a full list, see our Knowledge Base), grouping it, cross referencing and categorizing in order to make it accessible in the most user-friendly way, allowing you to deliver best possible support for your customers.
In order to perform our Service we process:
(as a data controller) internet protocol (IP) of everyone who visits our service or if sending us a message name, email address and your general location (
“Visitor”
)
(as a data controller) personal data of our customers (users of Service acting as Account Owner,  Administrators,  Agents  - jointly referred to as (
“You”
));
(as a processor on Your behalf ) personal data of Your customers.
3. How do we collect personal data
Visitors data
When the website is used for informational purposes - meaning You do not register as a user of the website or transmit other information to us - we do not collect any personal data, with the exception of the data which Your browser transmits to us in order to allow You to access the website. This data is:
IP address
Date and time of the query
Time zone difference to Greenwich Mean Time (GMT)
Content of the request (specific site)
Access status/HTTP status code
Volume of data transferred each time
Website from which the request comes
Browser
Operating system and its interface
Language and version of the browser software.
If you send us a message via a contact form you disclose your name, email address - apart from that we can track your movement on our website, see general location of your device.
We use this information to help us design our site to better suit our users’ needs. We may also use your IP address to help diagnose problems with our server and to administer our website, analyze trends, track visitor movements, and gather broad demographic information that assists us in identifying visitor preferences.
Your personal data
Groove collects personal data (name, email) during registration process and when You add new Agents. Groove also collects personal data such as IP address and API token when You use our Service.
If You activate new features, it’s possible new personal data will be collected. We will always inform You on the legal grounds and purposes of data collecting and also enable You to study the current Privacy Policy.
Your customer data
As a processor we do not collect any personal data without Your consent – we process Your customers’ personal data on Your behalf, which You have collected and explicitly provided to the Service. All this data belongs to You, we store it on our servers to support all of the Service’s features and remove them whenever You instruct us to.
We also provide You with features that enable You to profile Your customers by tracking their movements on the Knowledge Base (KB), by tracking read emails opened by Your customers as we also collect Your customers’ satisfaction ratings (for further information please visit
Tracking and Profiling
.
By using our contact form you can not only respond to your client’s message but also track your client’s movement on your website and collect data regarding your client’s location.
4. What kind of data do we process
The types of personal data that we collect include:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifiers (such as various advertising identifiers), instant messaging ID, internet protocol (IP) address, email address, account or user name, phone number, social media identifiers (e.g., Twitter handle, Instagram name, etc.), or other similar identifiers.
Customer records, such as customer contact name, email address, and credit card information. For example, if you sign-up for a free trial Account, you are not required to enter your credit card information unless and until you decide to continue with a paid subscription to our Services. As further described in Section 5, we may use third-party processors to process this information.
Commercial information and preferences, including records of creditworthiness, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Internet or other electronic network activity and device information, such as your browsing history, search history, information about your device, operating system, cellular carrier, location, and other information regarding your interactions with our Digital Properties or products and services, emails, mobile application, or advertisements. Some of this information may be collected using cookies and other tracking technologies as described more in Section 6 and our Website Cookie Policy found here.
Geolocation information, such as longitude and latitude from your IP address or mobile device location; city and state through a webform.
Professional or employment-related information, such as your company or employer, company website, your job title and role, training and certification activity, company information, or business address.
Inferences drawn from any of the information we collect to create a profile about you reflecting your preferences, characteristics, and behavior.
Email content. We collect the content of emails in order to process it, store it and present it to you in the most productive and user-friendly way to help you deliver the best support experience for your customers. We also build on top of these channels to give you additional features, such as collecting information regarding the time of opening an email by your customer, tracking your customer’s movements on KB and collecting your customers’ satisfaction ratings, tracking movement on your website. We also use Open AI to summarize your email contents if you use our AI feature.
We collect information how You use our Service, i.e. which features You use the most, which pages You visit, which buttons You click. We use cookies – more info
Cookies
.
Your customer data
This category is all data You give us access to, including email content, in order for us to process it, store it and present it to You in the most productive and user-friendly way to help You deliver the best support experience for Your customers.
We also build on top of these channels to give You additional features, such as collecting information regarding the time of opening an email by Your customer, tracking Your customer’s movements on KB and collecting Your customers’ satisfaction ratings, tracking movement on your website.
We also collect Your customers data which browsers send to us - please look at “
Visitors data
”.
We enable You to use third-party services however we don’t store the content.
If anything is unclear please contact our DPO at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
5. What are the legal grounds for processing data
We process Your data either on contractual ground (processing is necessary for the fulfilment of a contract or in order to take steps at Your request prior to entering into a contract) or the legal ground for processing your personal data is realization of the legitimate interests pursued by the controller (tracking movement on website for analytics, responding to messages sent by contact form).
We process Your data for marketing purposes only when You have given us Your consent.
We process Your customer data as processor pursuant to
Data Processing Agreement
.
6. What are the purposes of processing data:
Your personal data
Purpose
Category
Service performance including its development
email, name, billing information, API token, cookies, internet protocol (IP), location, tracking movement
Marketing
email addresses, name;
Service performance purposes means all data processing relevant to providing You with Service. This is information which we need for creating an account for You (name, e-mail address, billing information) but also to develop and maintain our Service (cookies, API token, internet protocol (IP). Groove analyzes trends, tracks Your movements so we can adjust Service to Your needs.
Marketing purposes mean that we want to inform You about our new features and products and send You a newsletter regarding it via email.
You can always withdraw Your consent – more at
Right to withdraw consent
.
Your customer data
We process Your customer data on Your behalf so you can use Groove.
We provide You with features that enable You to profile Your customers (tracking read emails, tracking online movements in Knowledge Base, tracking customers’ satisfaction ratings).
7. Tracking and Profiling
Your personal data
We use online tracking which means Groove collects certain information automatically and stores it in log files and databases. The information includes internet protocol (IP) addresses,  browser type, operating system and other usage information about the use of the Grooves’ website, including a history of the pages You visit in Groove, your location if using a contact form. Groove analyzes trends, tracks Your movements, and gathers this information in order to make better decisions in terms of product development, so it better suits Your needs and also for assisting us in debugging issues You report to us via our own support channels.
Although online tracking is an automated process in which we collect personal data (Your movements online)  Groove does not make any predictions or draws no conclusion about an individual – You – on that account. We use online tracking only for Service development. We don’t create any profiles nor do we make any decisions concerning You that are made based on online tracking. We are not profiling You.
Your customer data
We use email read receipt tracking as a feature of Service.We collect Your customers’ satisfaction ratings.
We use Knowledge Base as a feature of Service. Your customers can be tracked while using Knowledge Base. We collect their internet protocol (IP), the region or general location where Your customers’ computer or device is accessing the internet. We use cookies to track Your customers' activity on the Knowledge Base. Based on collected data Groove provides You with a statistical report. You may on that account make predictions or draw conclusions. Your customers are being profiled on Your behalf.
We use contact form as a feature of Service which enables you to collect personal data disclosed in a form as also enables to track movement on a website and collect data regarding location.
If you are a customer please contact your data controller – this is an entity you interact directly with.
In case of any doubts please contact our
dpo@groovehq.com
.
8. Cookies
A cookie is a small amount of data which often includes an anonymous unique identifier that is sent to Your browser from a web site’s computers and is stored on Your computer's hard drive.
Cookies are required to use Groove in order to uniquely identify Your browser and user preferences while logged in. We use non-permanent cookies that last for up to two weeks, after which You will be required to log in to the Service again.
You can control and/or delete cookies as You wish using Your browser preferences. You can delete all cookies that are already on Your computer and You can set most browsers to prevent them from being placed. If You do this, however, You may have to manually adjust some preferences every time You visit Groove and some services and functionalities may not work.
9. Who do we disclose Your data to
We cooperate with several third parties, however we do not disclose any personal data to them without Your demand or consent. If You wish to use any of third-parties services You will be asked to agree to third parties’ terms and conditions (including privacy policies).
The list of third parties can be found
here
.
10. Where and to whom do we transfer Your data
In order to maintain and develop the Service Groove engages other entities. You gave us general written authorisation in the
Data Processing Agreement
.
We are also obliged to engage only sub-processors who demonstrate adequate safeguards in onward transfer. Groove may not rely on a breach by a sub-processor of its obligations in order to avoid its own liabilities.
In the context of an onward transfer, Groove has responsibility for the processing of personal information it receives under the Privacy Shield and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Groove shall remain liable if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the Principles under the Privacy Shield, unless Groove proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
The list of sub-processors be found
here
.
Groove notifies You if we intend to change the list so You have the opportunity to object to such changes.
Groove’s use of information received from Google APIs will adhere to
Google API Services User Data Policy
, including the Limited Use requirements.
11. Your rights
Access:
You have a right to be informed about Your personal data processing, including the source of Your data collection, purpose of its processing and how long it will be stored .
If You have any question regarding Your personal data please contact our DPO at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
Rectification:
You have a right to access and change Your personal data provided during registration or creating an account. You can do this in the Profile section of Your Account Settings.
More info about Your rights as a Service user
here
.
Erasure (“right to be forgotten”):
In line with GDPR enforcement of the right to be forgotten, Groove introduces internal procedures which will streamline this process.
In other words You (as an Account owner and/or Admin) can decide whether You wish to permanently delete a whole account, a user account or just specific personal data. If You decide so the process will be irreversible.
Deletion can be performed by either using a “delete” function next to an appropriate piece of data in the Service (for example, Delete Ticket) or by contacting us on
support@groovehq.com
when a built-in option is not available.
Groove reserves the right to refuse permanent deletion for a legitimate reason, in particular but not limited to if current business affairs are not yet finished.
Restriction on processing:
You have a right to demand ceasing processing your data or restricting its processing with respect to exceptions set forth in art. 18 GDPR.
If You have any question regarding Your restriction rights please contact our DPO at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
Portability:
If You need to export/import data to the Service in a way which is not available, please contact us at
support@groovehq.com
so we can help You with Your custom needs.
However, we also have exposed an API which allows You to easily access Your data in a portable way as well import data from other systems.
You can read more about the API here:
https://developer.groovehq.com/
Right to withdraw consent:
You always can withdraw Your consent for processing Your data for marketing.
To do so just contact us at
support@groovehq.com
.
Lodge a complaint:
You have a right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority if You have concerns about how Groove processes Your personal data.
For more information please contact our DPO at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
12. Cross-border US - EU transfer
Groove is established in the United States. Information we collect from You and on Your behalf will be processed in the United States.
Groove ensures that along with SCCs adequate safeguard have been adopted.
Groove also relays on derogations for specific situations as set forth in Article 49 of the GDPR. In particular, Groove collects and transfers to the U.S. personal data only: with Your consent; to perform a contract with You; or to fulfil a compelling legitimate interest of Groove in a manner that does not outweigh Your nor Your customers’  rights and freedoms (Using a Contact form).
Groove endeavours to apply suitable safeguards to protect the privacy and security of Your and Your customers’ personal data and to use it only consistent with Your relationship with Groove and the practices described in this Privacy Policy.
13. Privacy Shield
Groove complies with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield and the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Frameworks as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Union and/or Switzerland to the United States. Groove has certified to the Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Privacy Shield Principles. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
With respect to European Personal Data received or transferred pursuant to the Privacy Shield Framework, Groove is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, Groove may be required to disclose European Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including meeting national security or law enforcement requirements.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the Privacy Shield website, if you are an European resident, you may invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
14. Data storage
Groove stores Your and Your customers’ personal data on the servers of the cloud-based database management services Groove engages, located in the United States. Groove is hosted at AWS which announced compliance with GDPR. For more information on their servers and security, please see AWS security whitepaper
https://docs.aws.amazon.com/whitepapers/latest/introduction-aws-security/welcome.html
.
Full list of hosting providers can be found
here
.
Groove notifies You if we intend to change the list so You have the opportunity to object to such changes.
For more information regarding data storage contact our DPO at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
15. Retention:
We keep all Your data that You have provided to us for the duration of Your business relationship with us and we remove data:
1) at Your explicit request (either via clicking the delete button next to a particular piece of data or via an email request to
support@groovehq.com
)
2) after You cancel Your account, at which point we remove Your data. This process takes up to 30 days to ensure all Your data is expunged from the system.
Most personal data is deleted once You demand it or our business relation is ceased, however we keep Your name and email address longer until all possible business affairs are finished.
For more information please contact our DPO at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
16. Security of data
We are committed to ensuring the best security for You, which means choosing the best hosting providers and data storage solutions, including those having ISO 27001 and PCI Level 1 certifications. We ensure encryption of communication not only between You and our servers but also internally between parts of our Service.
Groove restricts access to Your personal data to those employees who need to know that information to provide benefits or services to You. We maintain an internal Security Policy which ensures that all sensitive information is always transferred using secure, encrypted channels. In addition, we train our employees about the importance of confidentiality and maintaining the privacy and security of Your information. We commit to taking appropriate disciplinary measures to enforce our employees' privacy responsibilities.
17. Legal obligations regarding data.
Groove discloses personal data we process if necessary for the requirement to disclose personal information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Groove under Data Protection Agreement and Standard Contractual Clauses is obliged to promptly inform You of its inability to comply with SCCs clauses which enables each Party to suspend the transfer and terminate the contract.
18. Changes and updates to the Privacy Policy
As Groove changes from time to time, this Privacy Policy is expected to change as well.
We reserve the right to amend the Privacy Policy at any time, for any reason. We will inform You about that change by sending to You an email. Remember to check our Privacy Policy website.
19. Contact & Questions
In case of any queries please contact Groove’s DPO at
dpo@groovehq.com
.
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Groove appreciates the effort of software security researchers who work to make the Internet more secure. Our security vulnerability bounty system exists to reward the work of security researchers who find issues with our software and web services. You can find more about
our program here
.